Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 2 Content Standard 1.0 Forces and Motion: Students understand that forces such as gravitational, electrical, and magnetic influence the motion of objects.
Demonstrate that objects can move faster or slower than other objects.
Create own constructions using such tools as interlocking blocks and erector sets.
Demonstrate or model objects moving at different speeds (e.g., car speeds up or slows down, one person runs faster than another).
Using a model or pattern, demonstrate independently putting together and taking apart a structure (e.g., interlocking block tower, erector set crane, pattern block picture).
Demonstrate that objects move, but have difficulty predicting or describing motion.
Accurately follow a pattern, with teacher support, using such tools as interlocking blocks and erector sets (e.g., use three pattern blocks to create a hexagon, build a tower with five interlocking blocks).
Inaccurately demonstrate the movement of an object.
Have difficulty constructing, even with a model or pattern and teacher support.
EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD
BELOW STANDARD
1
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 2 Content Standard 2.0 Structure and Properties of Matter: Students understand that materials have distinct properties which depend on the amount of matter present, its chemical composition, and structure.
· · · · · · · · Sort and describe objects in terms of a wide variety of observable properties and state reasons for the categories.
Create larger objects from smaller objects so that they have symmetry (e.g., pattern blocks, symmetrical gumdrop structures).
Sort and describe objects in terms of some observable properties (e.g., color, shape, size, texture).
Independently form large objects from smaller objects (e.g., put together a puzzle or quilt).
Describe objects qualitatively in terms of a limited number of observable properties.
Form larger objects from smaller objects, with teacher support.
Inadequately describe objects in terms of observable properties.
Have difficulty forming larger objects from smaller objects, even with teacher support.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
2
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 2 Content Standard 3.0 E nergy and Matter: Interactions and Forms: Students understand that
changes in temperature and pressure can alter states of matter.
Energy exists in many forms, and one form can change into another.
EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · Predict whether a variety of objects will be cold, cool, warm, or hot and verify predictions; observe and record the temperatures of similar objects in different outdoor locations and explain that heat from the sun warms the objects.
Investigate and record changes in observable properties when substances change state.
Observe and record what happens when water is placed in a variety of open and closed containers.
Build an instrument to produce sound and classify the sound in terms of pitch and tone compare how sound travels through solids, liquids, and air.
Describe a variety of objects as being cold, cool, warm, or hot; describe the temperatures of similar objects in different outdoor locations and explain that heat from the sun warms the objects.
Describe an object before and after change of state in terms of observable properties.
Independently manipulate appropriate objects to produce various sounds by vibrating them; classify the sounds produced in terms of properties of pitch and tone.
Do not consistently and accurately use the descriptors cold, cool, warm, or hot.
Recognize a change of state but have difficulty describing before and after characteristics.
Need teacher assistance to manipulate appropriate objects to produce sound and need teacher assistance in describing sounds in terms of pitch and tone.
Are unable to distinguish large differences in temperature.
Recognize that a change has occurred, but do not relate it to the fact that the same matter can exist as a solid, liquid, or gas.
Do not identify sound as being caused by vibrations.
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · ·
3
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 2 Content Standard 6.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Structure and Function Students understand that all life forms, at all levels of organization, use specialized structures and similar processes to meet life's needs.: · · · · · · · · Consistently provide detailed and correct examples of how living things grow and change.
Classify correctly, a wide variety of living things according to established criteria.
Provide examples of how living things grow and change, with some minor errors in detail.
Classify living and non-living things according to established criteria, with few errors.
Give examples of how things grow and change, with some assistance.
Classify a limited number of living and non-living things according to established criteria, with assistance.
Provide inaccurate or incomplete examples of how things grow and change.
Are unable to classify things as living or non-living, without major errors.
MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
4
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 2 Content Standard 7.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD Internal and External Influences on Organisms: Students understand that organisms respond to internal and external influences.
· · Give examples of diseases caused by germs, and explain different ways they are spread and how the spread can be prevented.
Can explain that germs cause some diseases and may be spread by people who have them, explain that washing one's hands thoroughly with soap and water reduces the number of germs and their spread.
Can with some assistance make the connection between germs and disease and the ways germs are spread.
Do not make connections between germs and diseases and the ways germs are spread.
· ·
5
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 2 Content Standard 8.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD Heredity and Diversity: Students understand that life forms are diverse, and that they pass some characteristics to their offspring.
· · · · · · · · Explain that animals always give birth to offspring that are like themselves.
Sort a group of living things according to various, observable characters and justify each sort.
Describe, using common examples, that animals produce offspring that are like themselves (e.g., dogs produce puppies, not kittens).
Sort a group of living things and describe how some living things have similar observable characteristics (e.g., give rational justification of the sort).
Make mistakes in matching common animals and their offspring.
Have inconsistent success in sorting a group by similar observable characteristics.
Are not able to state with certainty that animals produce offspring like themselves.
Are unable to sort by similar characteristics, without support.
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
6
Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 2 Content Standard 10.0 Earth Structures and Composition: Students understand that the Earth is composed of interrelated systems of rocks, water, air, and life.
EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD · · · Group rock samples according to multiple attributes of shape, size, color, texture, and patterns of color or shading, and justify the reasons for their grouping.
Group rock samples according to a single attribute of shape, size, color, texture, or patterns of color or shading, and justify the reasons for their grouping.
Can group rock samples according to a single attribute of shape, size, color, texture, or patterns of color or shading, but is unable to justify the reasons for the grouping(s).
Are unable to group rock samples according to individual attributes.
BELOW STANDARD
·
7
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 2 Content Standard 12.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD Earth History: Students understand that Earth systems (such as weather and mountain formation) may change or vary.
· · · · Observe, record, and describe sequences of changes that take place in nature.
Observe and describe changes that take place in nature (e.g., weather, seasons, day and night).
Make observations and descriptions that are missing some details.
Make observations and descriptions that lack key details.
8
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 2 Content Standard 13.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD
Cycles of Matter and Energy: Students understand that Earth systems have a variety of cycles through which energy and matter continuously flow.
· · · · Compare and contrast measurements of temperature in sunny and shaded areas.
Compare and contrast local weather to weather in another location throughout the year.
Observe and describe the way ground, water, and air feel in the shade versus the sunlight.
Observe and describe how weather changes (including temperature, cloudiness, precipitation) from day to day and throughout the year.
Make accurate, but incomplete, observations of differences in the way ground, water, and air feel in shade versus sunlight.
Observe and describe how weather changes from day to day and throughout the year, but omit some significant details.
Make inaccurate and incomplete observations of differences in the way ground, water, and air feel in shade versus sunlight.
Observe and describe how weather changes, but do so inaccurately and incompletely.
MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD
· ·
BELOW STANDARD
· ·
9
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 2 Content Standard 14.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD Earth and Space Sciences: Students understand that the Earth is part of a planetary system within the Milky Way galaxy, which is part of the known universe.
· · · · · · · · Identify the sun, moon, and the Earth as components of our solar system.
Describe the appearance of the different phases of the moon, without attempting to explain the reason for the appearance.
Identify, from drawings or photographs, the sun, the moon, and stars; identify, from drawings, photographs, or verbal prompts, that the Earth is a planet.
Describe the movement of the sun across the sky, and tell that the moon appears in different places at different times.
Identify, with few errors, the sun, the moon, and stars and the Earth as a planet.
Describe the movement of the sun across the sky with few incorrect details, and inconsistently tell that the moon appears in different places at different times.
Identify incorrectly the sun, the moon, and stars and fail to identify the Earth as a planet.
Describe with little success the movement of the sun across the sky, and do not tell that the moon appears in different places at different times.
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
10
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 2 Content Standard 15.0 Ecosystems: Students will demonstrate an understanding that ecosystems display patterns of organization, change, and stability as a result of the interactions and interdependencies among the life forms and the physical components of the Earth.
· · · · · · · · Describe how animals depend upon plants, other animals, and other Earth resources for food, water, and shelter.
Provide detailed, significant examples of interactions between plants and animals.
Investigate, observe, and discuss the interactions between plants as producers and animals as consumers.
Provide examples of interdependence between plants and animals.
Participate in group investigations but can make little or no application to plants as having the role of being food for the animals that consume them.
Provide few or weak examples of interdependence between plants and animals.
Recognize that animals and plants are separate categories but do not recognize their interdependence.
Are unable to provide examples of interactions between plants and animals.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
11
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 2 Content Standard 16.0 Natural Resources: Students demonstrate and understand that natural resources include renewable and non-renewable materials and energy.
All organisms, including human, use resources to maintain and improve their existence, and the use of resources can have positive and negative consequences.
· · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · Classify samples of materials as reusable or nonreusable, and give reasons for their classifications.
Describe how and where humans obtain various natural resources.
Demonstrate to make new Describe the in their daily how some resources can be used and reused (e.g., use waste paper paper, recycle glass). various resources that provide the necessary things used by people lives.
EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD
Do not distinguish clearly between those resources which can be used and reused and those which cannot.
Identify a few of the various resources that provide the necessary things used by people in their daily lives.
Are unable to describe how some resources can be used and reused.
Are unable to identify the various resources that provide the necessary things used by people in their daily lives; confuse "want" and "need."
BELOW STANDARD
12
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 2 Content Standard 17.0 Conservation: Students understand that humans have the unique ability to change personal and societal behavior based on ethical considerations regarding other organisms, the planet as a whole, and future generations.
· · · · · · · · Give rich details in illustrations of how people live in different places in different ways.
Illustrate something that stays the same in their lives and how they accommodate something that changes.
Illustrate how people live in different places in different ways.
Illustrate how some things change in their daily lives and some things stay the same.
Illustrate but fail to include necessary details of how people live in different places in different ways.
Identify something that changes in their daily lives and something that stays the same.
Illustrate how people live in different places in different ways, but essential comparisons are inaccurate or incomplete.
Require teacher support to identify something that changes in their daily lives and something that stays the same.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD
BELOW STANDARD
13
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 2 Content Standard 18.0 Scientific, Historical, and Technological Perspectives: Students understand that humans have the unique ability to change personal and societal behavior based on ethical considerations regarding other organisms, the planet as a whole, and future generations.
(Nature of Science, Attributes of Scientific Research, The History of Science and Invention, Technology, The Dynamic Character of Scientific Knowledge, Scientific Ethics) EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD · · · · Generate an idea or an invention independently, and provide multiple some examples of thinkers and inventors from around the world.
Generate an idea or invention with prompting, and provide some examples of thinkers and inventors from around the world.
Are reluctant to suggest ideas; state that everybody can come up with ideas and inventions but do not provide examples.
Do not believe or cannot explain that everyone can come up with ideas or inventions.
14
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills
Grade 2 Content Standard 21.0 Scientific Values and Attitudes: Students understand that science is an active process of systematically examining the natural world.
EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · · Make qualitative and quantitative observations and provide descriptions using words, numbers, and drawings.
Independently record observations of investigations over time in a notebook or journal.
Make qualitative observations and provide pictorial or word descriptions of objects or phenomenon.
Record observations of investigations over time in a notebook or journal with minimal assistance (e.g., growth of a plant, changes in weather, insect growth and development).
Observe but provide inaccurate or incomplete descriptions.
Record, with some errors, observations of investigations over time in a notebook or journal.
Have little success in observing and providing descriptions.
Have little success in recording observations of investigations over time in a notebook or journal.
MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
· · · ·
15
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 2 Content Standard 22.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Communication Skills: Students understand that a variety of communication methods can be used to share scientific information.
· · · · · · · · · · · · Consistently follow verbal and written instructions accurately.
Consistently produce simple pictographs to describe observations.
Provide leadership to a cooperative group and consistently contribute ideas within a group.
Generally follow verbal and written instructions accurately.
Generally produce simple pictographs to describe observations.
Cooperate and contribute ideas within a group.
Often misinterpret verbal and written instructions.
Occasionally produce simple pictographs to describe observations.
Usually cooperate but contribute ideas within a group reluctantly.
Seldom follow verbal and written instructions accurately.
Can produce simple pictographs to describe observations, only with sustained teacher support.
Cooperate and contribute ideas within a group, only with teacher supervision.
MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
16
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 2 Content Standard 23.0 Scientific Applications of Mathematics: Students understand that scientific inquiry is enhanced and often communicated by using mathematics.
· · · · Use mental computation to readily make estimates that are very close to the correct value.
Identify unexpected or unusual results in activities, when counting or measuring using standard or non-standard units.
Generally use mental computation to make rough estimates (e.g., simple addition and subtraction problems).
Adequately identify unexpected or unusual results in activities, when counting or measuring using non-standard units (e.g., measuring classroom chairs with "handspans" and with rulers).
Need practice using mental computation to make rough estimates.
Attempt to identify unexpected or unusual results in activities, when counting or measuring using non-standard or standard units with limited success.
Are reluctant to use mental computation to estimate and/or when they do so, estimated values are far from the acceptable range.
Have little or no success identifying unexpected or unusual results in activities, when counting or measuring using non-standard or standard units.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
· · · ·
17
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 2 Content Standard 24.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD Laboratory Skills and Safety: Students can appropriately and safely apply the tools and techniques of scientific inquiry.
· · · · Consistently keep accurate, orderly records of observations and measurements taken over time.
Generally keep accurate records of observations and measurements taken over time (e.g., plant growth, metamorphosis, evaporation, weather conditions).
Attempt to keep a record of observations and measurements taken over time but records are inaccurate and/or have missing entries.
Do not keep records of observations and measurements that are able to be used.
18
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 3 Content Standard 1.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Forces and Motion: Students understand that forces such as gravitational, electrical, and magnetic influence the motion of objects.
· · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · · · · Model a change in motion involving a change in speed, a change in direction, and a change in both speed and direction and that objects are more difficult to start and to stop moving when they have mass added to them.
Create different objects that are balanced and explain the situations by describing the point of balance (e.g., use a "see saw", balance unequal weights).
Use appropriate tools to creatively construct, (e.g., model soapbox derby car, model fort, model volcano).
Demonstrate that a given push or pull (hard or soft) causes an object to change its speed (faster or slower) and/or direction.
Predict whether or not an object will topple or balance.
Effectively manipulate simple tools (e.g., hammer and nails, screwdriver and screws, nuts and bolts) and demonstrate when to use specific tools.
Demonstrate that a push or pull causes an object to change its motion.
Demonstrate when an object is balanced but do not explain completely.
Are unsure of when to use simple tools or have difficulty manipulating them in construction(s).
Fail to demonstrate that a push or pull causes an object to change its motion.
Are unable to set up an example of a balanced object.
Are unsure of how to use simple tools.
APPROACHES STANDARD
BELOW STANDARD
19
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 3 Content Standard 2.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Structure and Properties of Matter: Students understand that materials have distinct properties which depend on the amount of matter present, its chemical composition, and structure.
· Describe objects in terms of a wide range of observable properties using measurements where possible (e.g., texture, geometric shape, length, volume, luster, state of matter).
· Sort objects by multiple observable characteristics or attributes (e.g., dimensions, coloration, symmetry, parts, state of matter) using Venn diagrams or other classification schemes; identify or create a classification system from observing objects that are already grouped; explain reasons for creating categories.
· · Describe objects in terms of observable properties (e.g., color, texture, size, state of matter, symmetry).
Sort objects on the basis of two or more observable characteristics or attributes (e.g., dimensions, coloration, symmetry, parts, state of matter) using Venn diagrams or other schemes; identify or create a classification system from observing objects that are already grouped.
Describe objects in terms of some observable properties (e.g., color, texture, size, state of matter).
Sort and classify objects, organisms, or phenomena into two general groups in terms of observable properties (e.g., coloration, symmetry, size).
Inaccurately describe objects in terms of some observable properties.
Are unable to sort and classify objects, organisms, or phenomena into general groups in terms of observable properties.
MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
20
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 3 Content Standard 3.0 Energy and Matter: Interactions and Forms: Students understand that changes in temperature and pressure can alter states of matter.
Energy exists in many forms, and one form can change into another.
· · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · Measure, record, and graph changes in temperature indoors and outdoors for one week; explain patterns that appear; describe different kinds of common thermometers and the kinds of situations they are used in.
Predict changes in the state of matter and state reasons (e.g., solid ice melts into liquid when placed in a warm environment).
Use a thermometer to measure and record a range of temperatures; label each as hot, warm, cool, or cold.
Investigate, using direct observations, and describe in detail how a solid changes into a liquid, and water evaporates if left in an open container.
Can generally read temperature on a thermometer, but inaccurately characterize it as hot or cold.
Can adequately describe processes that take place in the change of state of matter, but provide little detail in observable properties.
Have difficulty reading and relating the temperature on a thermometer to degrees of heat.
Are unable to describe the process of a substance changing state or changes in properties that accompany the change in state.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD
BELOW STANDARD
21
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 3 Content Standard 6.0 Structure and Function: Students understand that all life forms, at all levels of organization, use specialized structures and similar processes to meet life's needs.
· Observe and accurately describe the growth of a plant over time and explain that plants have a life cycle that includes seed germination, development, and reproduction; observe and accurately describe the life cycle of a domestic animal and an animal that undergoes metamorphosis; relate the stages in the organism's development to its need for water, air, space, food.
Independently and correctly classify plants and animals representative of major categories on the basis of identifiable structures.
Observe and describe the growth of a plant (e.g., a bean plant) over time and identify plant growth patterns (e.g., sprouting of seeds, formation of roots, leaves, and stems, development of flowers and seeds); observe and describe the life cycle of a domestic animal and an animal that undergoes metamorphosis (e.g., a frog, butterfly, or mealworm); describe the needs of living organisms.
Classify plants and animals representative of major groups (e.g., evergreen vs. deciduous trees, animals with an external, internal or no skeleton, etc., with few errors.
Provides incomplete and erroneous descriptions of life cycles of plants and animals and their need for food, water, air, etc.
Require assistance to classify plants and animals according to identifiable structures.
Are unable to describe key stages in the life cycles of plants and animals life and their need for food, air, water, etc., with strong teacher support.
Are unable to classify plants and animals.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· MEETS STANDARD ·
·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
22
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 3 Content Standard 7.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Internal and External Influences on Organisms: Students understand that organisms respond to internal and external influences.
· · Investigate and describe and give examples of how various living things behave differently under differing conditions with a high degree of accuracy.
Explain clearly, with examples, how germs affect the functions of the body, that different diseases may cause identical symptoms, and describe how the defenses that humans have against germs work.
Describe and give with examples of how various living things behave differently under differing conditions (e.g., migration, coloration, hibernation) with minimal errors.
Explain that germs affect the functions of the body and identify defenses that the human body has against germs (e.g., saliva, skin, special blood cells).
Can provide a limited description of how various living things behave differently under differing conditions.
Have difficulty describing the effects of germs and the human body's defense against defending them.
Recognize that germs affect the functions of the body.
Provide a description of how various living things behave differently under differing conditions that includes major misconceptions.
Give an inaccurate explanation of how germs affect the functions of the body.
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· ·
23
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 3 Content Standard 8.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Heredity and Diversity: Students understand that life forms are diverse, and that they pass some characteristics to their offspring.
· · · · · · · · Describe, using examples, how the young of a species resemble their parents and how they are different, describe how siblings may resemble each other.
Independently sort a group of living things by appearance and behavior and give rational justification of the sort.
Give examples of how offspring may resemble parents and other siblings.
Sort a group of living things by appearance and behavior and give rational justification of the sort with minimal help.
Need assistance to give examples of how offspring may resemble parents and other siblings.
Sort a group of living things by appearance and behavior but require substantial help to justify the basis of the sort.
Do not make the connection of how offspring resemble parents and siblings.
Cannot sort a group of living things by appearance and behavior and cannot give rational justification of the sort.
MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD
BELOW STANDARD
24
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 3 Content Standard 9.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Evolution-The Process of Biological Change: Students understand that life forms change over time.
· · Illustrate by providing a variety of examples of different kinds of living things within a particular group (e.g., fish, insects, trees, flowering plants).
Provide specific examples of characteristics which allow plants and animals to survive in specific environments, such as how a monkey's tail helps it survive in the rainforest canopy.
Illustrate by providing diverse examples of the many different kinds of living things that exists on earth.
Provide general examples of how particular features of plants and animals help them live in different kinds of places (e.g., the thickened stems of cacti enable them to store water and live in the desert).
Can provide only limited examples of the many different kinds of living things that exist on earth.
Provide limited examples of how particular features of plants and animals help them live in different kinds of places.
Examples of living things are limited to the animal kingdom, other kingdoms are omitted.
Provide examples of specific features that do not relate to the survival of the plant or animal.
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
25
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 3 Content Standard 10.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · · · · Earth Structures and Composition: Students understand that the Earth is composed of interrelated systems of rocks, water, air, and life.
Describe some uses for various Earth materials and some of the places where those materials are found.
Identify landforms and give justifications for their identification by describing features of those landforms.
Compare relative areas of ocean and land on Earth's surface (e.g., laying a grid over a world map and counting squares over land and squares over ocean).
Identify, with few or no errors, various samples of Earth materials (e.g., rocks, minerals, soil, sand, gravel, water, ice, air).
Identify landforms (e.g., mountains, valleys).
Describe the shape of the Earth as "round like a ball" (or as a sphere); compare, using maps and models, relative areas of ocean and land on Earth's surface.
Inconsistently identify various samples of Earth materials.
Inconsistently identify landforms.
Describe the shape of the Earth two-dimensionally (as "a circle"), and attempt to compare relative areas of ocean and land on Earth's surface.
Are unable to identify various samples of Earth materials.
Are unable to identify landforms.
Are unable to identify the shape of the Earth and give mostly inaccurate comparisons of land and ocean areas on Earth's surface.
APPROACHES STANDARD
BELOW STANDARD
26
Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 3 Content Standard 11.0
Earth Models: Students understand that the Earth may be represented by a variety of maps and models.
· · · · · · · · Given a map, identify the directions north, south, east, and west.
Identify specific locations on the state map (state capitol, county seats, lakes, rivers).
Indicate any one of three map directions as requested when given the fourth direction in the classroom.
Locate the state of Nevada on a national map and their own city or town on a Nevada state map.
Inconsistently indicate directions.
Inconsistently locate the state of Nevada and their own city.
Are unable to identify directions successfully.
Are unable to locate the state of Nevada and their own city.
EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
27
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 3 Content Standard 12.0
Earth History: Students understand that Earth systems (such as weather and mountain formation) may change or vary.
· · Measure and record rates of change of various natural phenomena.
Observe and describe, with examples, how some changes are so slow (e.g., the growth of a plant, the movement of an hour hand on a clock) or so fast (e.g., lightning strikes, eye blinks, the change from dark to light when a light is turned on) and that they are hard to see while they happen.
Have difficulty identifying and describing changes that happen extremely slowly or extremely rapidly.
Are unable to identify changes that happen so slowly or so quickly that they are hard to see.
EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
· ·
28
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 3 Content Standard 13.0
Cycles of Matter and Energy: Students understand that Earth systems have a variety of cycles through which energy and matter continuously flow.
· · · Describe the relationship between temperatures and brightnesses of light bulbs of various sizes (wattages).
Observe, record, and describe seasonal differences using words, numbers, and drawings, independently.
Describe properties of liquid water and solid ice; generalize these properties to other examples of liquids and solids.
Observe and describe that some objects that give off light (e.g., small light bulbs, the sun) also give off heat.
Observe, record, and describe seasonal differences (e.g., weather, changes in leaves of decidious trees) using words, numbers (e.g., temperatures), and drawings, with minimal assistance.
Observe and describe that water can be a liquid or a solid, and explain that changes in temperature can cause water to go back and forth from one form to another.
Observe and describe, with some errors, how objects that give off light also give off heat.
Observe, record, and describe seasonal differences using words, numbers, and drawings, with considerable teacher support.
Observe and describe, with some errors, how water can be a liquid or a solid, and explain with limited success that changes in temperature can cause water to go back and forth from one form to another.
Observe and describe, with major errors, how objects that give off light also give off heat.
Observe, record, and describe with major confusion, seasonal differences using words, numbers, and drawings.
Are unable to describe how water can be a liquid or a solid, and relate changes in its form to temperature changes.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · ·
29
Performance Level Descriptors Sciences Grade 3 Content Standard 14.0
Earth and Space Science: Students understand that the Earth is part of a planetary system within the Milky Way galaxy, which is part of the known universe.
· · · · · · · · Identify the sun, moon, planets, asteroids, comets, and Earth as components of our solar system, and give rudimentary descriptions of each.
Identify a constellation from a photograph, drawing, or direct observation.
Identify the sun, moon, and the Earth as components of our solar system.
Explain that there are more stars in the sky than anyone could easily count.
Identify with minimal assistance the sun, moon, and the Earth as components of our solar system.
Explain inconsistently that there are more stars in the sky than anyone could easily count.
Identify that the sun, moon, and the Earth as components of our solar system unsuccessfully.
Demonstrate insufficient understanding that there are more stars in the sky than anyone could easily count.
EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD
BELOW STANDARD
30
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 3 Content Standard 15.0 Ecosystems: Students will demonstrate an understanding that ecosystems display patterns of organization, change, and stability as a result of the interactions and interdependencies among the life forms and the physical components of the Earth.
· · · · · · · · Create a habitat for a simple organism demonstrating how an organism's surroundings provide for its needs.
Design and set up a mini-ecosystem (e.g. a closed terrarium or aquarium) and observe and record the results and changes over time.
Identify, using appropriate examples, some similarities and differences found in animals and plants that help them live in their unique habitats.
Describe, using diagrams and/or illustrations, several ways organisms interact with each other.
Identify some similarities and differences found in animals and plants that help them live in their unique habitats.
Describe several ways organisms interact with each other.
Are unable to specify similarities and differences found in animals and plants that help them live in their unique habitats.
Are unable to list important ways organisms interact with each other.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
31
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 3 Content Standard 16.0
Natural Resources: Students demonstrate and understand that natural resources include renewable and non-renewable materials and energy.
All organisms, including human, use resources to maintain and improve their existence, and the use of resources can have positive and negative consequences.
· · · · · · Describe in detail how one natural resource is obtained.
Compare and contrast how people in different cultures obtain and use natural resources.
Explain that natural resources are used for many purposes (e.g., trees are used for construction, paper, and fuel); provide multiple examples.
Describe how humans have obtained natural resources for thousands of years through farming, mining, and hunting and gathering.
Have difficulty identifying examples of natural resources that are used for many purposes.
Describe, without some necessary details, how humans have obtained natural resources for thousands of years through farming, mining, and hunting and gathering.
Are not able to explain that natural resources are used for many purposes.
Describe, mostly inaccurately, how humans have obtained natural resources for thousands of years through farming, mining, and hunting and gathering.
EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD
BELOW STANDARD
· ·
32
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 3 Content Standard 17.0 Conservation: Students understand that humans have the unique ability to change personal and societal behavior based on ethical considerations regarding other organisms, the planet as a whole, and future generations.
· · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · Provide a wide variety of examples of materials that can be recycled and used again, some in different forms, and describe how individuals may participate in recycling efforts.
Analyze the components of multiple patterns, and make reasonable predictions of the continuation of the patterns.
Provide examples of materials that can be recycled and used again, including some in different forms.
Make a reasonable prediction of a pattern's continuation based on a given pattern of observable change.
Give only a few examples of materials that can be recycled and used again.
Can identify the pattern of observable change, but make unreasonable predictions of its continuation.
Cannot connect the change of materials into different forms for reuse.
Cannot recognize a given pattern of observable change sufficiently to make a prediction.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
33
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 3 Content Standard 18.0 Scientific, Historical, and Technological Perspectives: Students understand that humans have the unique ability to change personal and societal behavior based on ethical considerations regarding other organisms, the planet as a whole, and future generations.
(Nature of Science, Attributes of Scientific Research, The History of Science and Invention, Technology, The Dynamic Character of Scientific Knowledge, Scientific Ethics) · · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · · Make observations, ask questions, and seek answers independently.
Record accurate and thoughtful observations, and routinely compare their results with others.
Describe that men and women of all ages and backgrounds make contributions to various scientific fields.
Evaluate the benefits of being part of a team after participating in a group project.
Skillfully use tools to build a device which can be used in making a task easier.
Make observations, ask questions, and seek answers with teacher support.
Generally observe, and record accurately in order to compare findings with others.
Identify that women and men of all different ages and backgrounds make contributions to science.
Identify benefits of working with a team and sharing findings.
Competently use tools (e.g., hammer, screwdrivers, balances, hand lens, pencil sharpener, and lever) to make a task easier.
Make incomplete or inaccurate observations, ask questions reluctantly, but show interest in learning about the natural world.
Make errors in observation and record keeping.
Attempt to identify roles of men and women in various scientific fields.
Are uncertain that women and men of different ages and backgrounds make contributions to science.
Can identify few benefits of being part of a team after participation in a group project.
Ineffectively use tools to build a device which can be used in making a task easier.
Have little success in making observations and asking questions; show little interest in learning about the natural world.
Have little success observing and recording findings and comparing with others.
View science as a field in which only certain people make contributions.
Do not contribute to the evaluation of being part of a team after participation in a group project.
Have little success using tools to build a device which can be used in making a task easier.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
34
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 3 Content Standard 20.0
Systems, Models, Risk and Predictions: Students understand that a variety of models can be used to describe or predict things and events.
· · · Compare and contrast several models with what they represent describing similarities and differences, using supporting diagrams.
Identify and represent simple patterns and correctly predict future events in the pattern.
Detect patterns in nature based on personal observation.
Demonstrate, with several examples, that when parts are joined, they can do things together they could not have done independently.
Compare and contrast a model with what it represents.
Identify and represent observable patterns and correctly predict the next likely event based on the pattern (e.g., life cycles, seasonal weather changes, phases of the moon).
Demonstrate, with an example, that when parts or substances are joined or mixed, they can do things together they could not have done by themselves (e.g., bread and its ingredients, a working model car and its parts).
Make a simple drawing to represent a real object (e.g., a map of their room).
Identify and describe simple patterns but have difficulty representing sequences and predicting the next likely event based on the pattern.
Can describe that when parts are put together, they can do things together they could not have done by themselves but cannot give appropriate examples.
Are unable to compare and contrast a model with what it represents.
Occasionally identify a simple pattern, but cannot predict the next likely event in the pattern.
Can detect patterns based on personal observations.
Have little success in describing or demonstrating that when parts are put together, they can do things together they could not have done by themselves.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · ·
35
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 3 Content Standard 21.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Scientific Values and Attitudes: Students understand that science is an active process of systematically examining the natural world.
· · MEETS STANDARD · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · Observe and raise thoughtful questions about the world.
Develop questions based on one or more observations, and using tables or bar graphs to help identify patterns, independently seek answers through investigations.
Accurately record observations of investigations over time in a notebook or journal (e.g., changes in an aquarium or terrarium, evaporation).
Observe and raise questions about the world and seek answers through investigations (e.g., the actions of toys, development and characteristics of schoolyard plants).
Record observations of investigations over time in a notebook or journal (e.g., changes in a terrarium, in a tadpole as it matures).
Make observations, when directed, but seldom raise questions about the world or seek answers through investigations.
Occasionally record observations of investigations over time in a notebook or journal.
Make inaccurate observations and show little interest in learning about the natural world.
Observations, when recorded in a notebook or journal, are difficult to follow.
BELOW STANDARD
36
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 3 Content Standard 22.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Communication Skills: Students understand that a variety of communication methods can be used to share scientific information.
· · · MEETS STANDARD · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · Accurately follow verbal and written instructions to complete a procedure.
Create clear illustrations, graphs, and charts to convey ideas and record observations.
Consistently cooperate and contribute ideas within a group.
Generally follow verbal and written instructions to complete a procedure.
Create adequate illustrations, graphs, and charts to convey ideas and record observations that are generally easy to understand.
Generally cooperate and contribute ideas within a group.
Have difficulty in following verbal and written instructions to complete a procedure.
Create illustrations, graphs, and charts to convey ideas and record observations that are often confusing.
Occasionally cooperate and contribute ideas within a group.
Follow verbal and written instructions to complete a procedure only with sustained teacher support.
Create illustrations, graphs, and charts to convey ideas and record observations, only with sustained teacher support.
Seldom cooperate and contribute ideas within a group.
37
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 3 Content Standard 23.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Scientific Applications of Mathematics: Students understand that scientific inquiry is enhanced and often communicated by using mathematics.
· · Use mental computation to readily make estimates that are very close to the correct value.
Determine whether measurements and descriptions are reasonably accurate; verify the reasonableness of results by checking measurements against "known" values; explain what a scale drawing is, using an example.
Generally use mental computation to make rough estimates (e.g., addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, measurement problems).
Determine whether measurements and descriptions are reasonably accurate (i.e., compare objects by measuring their lengths, weights, and capacities; verify the reasonableness of their results by checking their measurements against "known" values (e.g., length of classroom, quart of milk).
Need practice in using mental computation to make rough estimates.
Attempt to determine whether measurements and descriptions are reasonably accurate, but, their measurements are often inaccurate and they are unsure of how to go about verifying the reasonableness of a measurement.
Are reluctant to use mental computation to estimate.
Have limited success in determining whether measurements and descriptions are reasonably accurate.
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· ·
BELOW STANDARD
· ·
38
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 3 Content Standard 24.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · · · Laboratory Skills and Safety: Students can appropriately and safely apply the tools and techniques of scientific inquiry.
Consistently use equipment properly and safely in all science activities and help other students to do so.
Consistently identify and gather tools and materials needed in an investigation.
Consistently use equipment properly and safely in all science activities.
Identify and gather tools and materials needed in an investigation.
Attempt to use equipment properly and safely in all science activities.
Attempt to identify and gather tools and materials needed in an investigation.
Do not know how to use equipment properly and sometimes act in an unsafe manner when engaged in science activities.
Are unsure of which tools and materials are needed in an investigation.
39
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 5 Content Standard 1.0
Forces and Motion: Students understand that forces such as gravitational, electrical, and magnetic influence the motion of objects.
· · · · · Accurately predict the change in motion that will result from a particular push or pull on an object.
Investigate the behavior of objects moving on ramps or being released in the air, observing and recording data, and explain how gravity affects the motion of those objects.
Explain the mechanics of objects moving in a variety of different ways (e.g., round things roll and flat objects slide).
Create an object that is buoyant in water (e.g., aluminum or clay boat).
Demonstrate the ability of magnets to attract certain materials, without touching them and that like magnetic poles repel.
Demonstrate and describe that the greater the push or pull on an object, the greater the change in motion of that object.
Give examples of falling objects and explain that a force (gravity) is pulling them down.
Categorize objects that move in different directions (e.g., forward and back and sideways), in a variety of ways (e.g., rotating, rolling, or revolving) and with varying ease of movement (friction).
Can accurately predict which objects will sink or float in air or water and can classify them on the basis of this behavior.
Predict, sort, and classify objects and materials that magnets attract; demonstrate and describe that like magnetic poles repel.
Can state that there is a relationship between a push or a pull and the resulting motion.
Can describe what happens when an object is released on a ramp or in the air but cannot explain that gravity is the force pulling on the object.
Can sometimes describe the movement of objects in a variety of ways.
Can sort objects that sink or float, but cannot predict whether they sink or float.
Can sort and classify objects and materials that magnets attract, but cannot accurately predict which materials the magnet will attract.
Do not detect a relationship between a push or a pull and the resulting motion.
Cannot accurately describe the movement of an object falling in the air or moving down a ramp.
Give inaccurate descriptions for the movement of objects.
Have difficulty sorting and classifying sinking and floating objects.
Inaccurately sort and classify objects and materials that magnets attract.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · · · ·
40
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 5 Content Standard 2.0 Structure and Properties of Matter: Students understand that materials have distinct properties which depend on the amount of matter present, its chemical composition, and structure.
· · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · Explain common techniques useful for separating the components of mixtures based on their properties, and apply one or more to physically recover the components.
Classify and describe matter, comparing and contrasting elements, compounds, and mixtures; giving multiple examples of each.
Use a simple model to explain observed properties of matter.
Use specific geometric terms in describing the crystalline patterns formed after water has evaporated from solutions of various soluble solids (e.g., cubic salt crystals and octahedral alum crystals).
Identify and demonstrate ways that a substance can be broken down physically into smaller pieces and still retain its same properties.
Describe observable properties of a wide range of common materials and relate the properties to the way in which the material is actually used.
Separate the components of a mixture based on their properties when provided with directions (e.g., recovering sand and sugar from a mixture of the two or recovering sugar from a water solution) and describe why the technique worked.
Compare and contrast elements, compounds, and mixtures.
Give common examples of elements, compounds, and mixtures.
Investigate and describe that patterns of crystals are formed after water has evaporated from a solution.
Describe the properties of large and small pieces of a material and explain that the properties are the same (e.g., a sheet of paper versus pieces of paper, chunk of rock and a fragment, cinnamon stick and powdered cinnamon).
Describe the observable properties (e.g., state of matter, ductility, malleability, color, strength, shape, etc.) of various materials and suggest uses for them based on their properties.
Compare and contrast the properties and composition of various materials.
Are unable to successfully separate the components of a mixture even with detailed directions and/or describe differences in physical properties which make separation of components possible.
Have difficulty defining or giving correct examples of elements, compounds, and mixtures.
Inconsistently identify the patterns of crystals formed after water has evaporated from solutions of various soluble solids.
Inaccurately describe the physical properties of large and small pieces or are unable to explain that making smaller pieces from large ones does not change their properties Identify obvious properties, but descriptions and comparisons lack necessary detail.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · ·
41
Physical Science Grade 5 (Content 2.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · Are unable to separate the components of a mixture and describe pertinent properties.
Cannot define or give examples of elements, compounds, and mixtures.
Are unable to discern and describe differences in the patterns of crystals formed after water has evaporated from solutions of various soluble solids.
Are unable to describe that the properties of large and small pieces of a material are the same.
Have difficulty identifying and describing obvious properties of materials.
42
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 5 Content Standard 3.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · · Energy and Matter: Interactions and Forms: Students understand that changes in temperature and pressure can alter states of matter.
Energy exists in many forms, and one form can change into another.
Predict what happens when warm objects meet cold objects and design a demonstration that shows warm objects cool and cool objects warm when placed together (e.g., mixing hot and cold water).
Research and explain, with supporting diagrams, how matter and energy interact in the water cycle and the rock cycle and how these cycles affect the surface of the earth; use and cite multiple resources.
Build simple instruments and demonstrate the relationship between the volume of vibrating air and the pitch.
Independently build and diagram an electrical circuit (parallel or series) using components such as switches, wires, batteries, sockets, motor, and lights and describe their functions.
Gather data to describe the cooling of warm objects and the warming of cool objects when brought together.
Make accurate observations.
Investigate how energy and matter interact when water changes phases from solid to liquid to gas and vice versa; relate these interactions to and diagram the water cycle, indicating whether energy is absorbed or released in each phase change.
Demonstrate how changes in sound can be made given appropriate supplies such as a uniform set of eight glasses or test tubes, a metal spoon, chopstick and a container of water; record and summarize the findings.
Follow instructions to build a simple series electrical circuit and describe the use of various components (e.g., switches, wires, batteries, sockets, motor, and lights) .
Are able to describe the cooling of warm objects and the warming of cool objects, when brought together with teacher support.
Are able to describe that how energy effects phase changes, but have difficulty in relating energy to phase changes in the water cycle.
Manipulate instruments to produce sound but are unable to discern patterns in the vibrations and sounds.
Follow instructions to build a circuit but inadequately explain the function of various components.
Are unable to discern what happens when warm objects and cool objects are brought together.
Are unable to describe how the use of energy effects a change of state and/or describe the water cycle.
Manipulate instruments to make sounds, but do not explain the relationship between vibrations and sounds.
Are unsuccessful in building an electrical circuit.
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
· ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · · ·
43
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 5 Content Standard 4.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Chemical Reaction: Students understand that chemical reactions change substances into different substances.
· Design and carry out, with teacher approval, demonstrations to show changes in materials when they are heated or mixed and describe resulting changes in those materials; indicate those changes where a new material with new and different properties has been formed.
Observe and record the effects of common physical and chemical changes (e.g., melting and burning candle wax, dissolving sugar in water, heating sugar, mixing baking soda with vinegar, baking a cake); distinguish between a phase and a chemical change.
Can identify some simple physical and chemical changes, but descriptions are incomplete or inaccurate.
Confuse phase and chemical changes.
MEETS STANDARD
·
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
· ·
44
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 5 Content Standard 6.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Life Science: Students understand that all life forms, at all levels of organization, use specialized structures and similar processes to meet life's needs.
· · · Observe, draw, label, and compare and contrast the life cycles of representative plants and animals including birth or germination, development, reproduction, and death.
Independently classify structures from various organisms according to their function; explain that in classifying organisms biologists consider internal and external structure to be more significant than general appearance or behavior.
Design, and depict in detail, an animal and a plant for specific habitats, demonstrating an understanding of the relationships between the habitat of an organism and the organism's structures and functions.
Observe, draw, label, and compare and contrast the essential features of the life cycles of representative plants and animals including birth or germination, development of plants (seeds to roots, stems and leaves to flowers to seeds) and development of animals (e.g., frog, silk moth, cricket) with only minor error or missions.
Classify structures of various organisms according to their functions, with minor errors.
Give examples of specific features which enable a wide variety of plants and animals to live in their environments.
Identify and describe life cycles of different living things, but descriptions are inaccurate or lack important detail.
Recognize that various organisms have similar structures, but have difficulty relating structures to functions.
Can identify distinctive features of plants and animals, but may have difficulty describing how these features help them live in their environments.
Have difficulty conceptualizing and identifying stages of development.
Require assistance to relate similar structures of different organisms.
Display insufficient knowledge of how the features of plants and animals are related to their environments.
MEETS STANDARD
·
· · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · BELOW STANDARD · · ·
45
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 5 Content Standard 7.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · Internal and External Influences on Organisms: Students understand that organisms respond to internal and external influences.
Accurately relate sensory input to behavioral responses, provide multiple examples of special ways in which humans, plants, and animals respond to stimuli.
Provide evidence of teaching an organism a learned behavior.
Accurately interpret various environmental conditions as favorable or unfavorable to a specific living thing.
Relate sensory input to behavioral response, with reasonable assistance (e.g., plant turning toward the sun, animals turning toward sound).
Develop a reasonable plan to teach an organism a learned behavior.
Make reasonable predictions that some environmental conditions are more favorable than others to living things (e.g., that there is a far greater diversity of life in a rain forest than in a desert or tundra).
Attempt to relate sensory input to behavioral response with limited success.
Develop a plan, with assistance, to teach an organism a learned behavior.
Make simple inferences about environmental conditions that may be favorable or unfavorable to living things.
Demonstrate serious misconceptions in relating sensory input to behavioral response.
Are unable to develop a plan to teach an organism a learned behavior.
Can not identify specific environmental conditions as favorable or unfavorable to living things.
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
46
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 5 Content Standard 8.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Heredity and Diversity: Students understand that life forms are diverse, and that they pass some characteristics to their offspring.
· · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · Select examples of animal species that seem to be limited to inherited behaviors and examples of animal species that can learn a wide variety of behaviors and relate these behaviors to the complexity of their respective brains.
Explain that living things can be classified by similar features, behaviors, and/or habits, depending on the purpose of the classification and provide classifying examples of each type.
Research evidence of the range of variation in some organisms and graph the range of variation.
Explain why reproduction is such a crucial issue to endangered species.
Differentiate inherited traits from learned traits and illustrate with appropriate examples.
Explain that living things are classified by similar features, behaviors, and/or habits and provide some examples.
Illustrate, by providing several examples, that there are variations among individuals within a population of certain species.
Relate reproduction to the continuation of species.
Given examples, can generally differentiate between inherited traits from learned traits.
Describe that living things are classified by similar characteristics, behaviors, and/or habits, but are unable to provide examples.
Provide limited numbers of examples (one or two) of variations among individuals within a population of a certain species.
Require assistance to relate reproduction to the continuation of species.
Have little success differentiating between learned and inherited traits.
Are unable to provide examples of variations among individuals within a population of certain aspects.
Do not relate reproduction to the continuation of species.
47
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 5 Content Standard 9.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · Evolution-The Process of Biological Change: Students understand that life forms change over time.
Construct a hierarchical concept map depicting major groups of plants, animals, other and their characteristics; include flowering plants, cone-bearing plants, ferns, invertebrates, vertebrates, birds, reptiles, mammals, etc.
Provide well-developed examples of environmental changes that have allowed some species to survive and others to become extinct.
Show that in a given environment different animals have made different adaptations for survival; include specific, clarifying examples.
Classify animals and plants according to their physical characteristics.
Identify examples of environmental changes that have allowed some species to survive and caused others to become extinct.
Identify examples of how differences in individual characteristics may give an advantage for survival.
Classify animals and plants according to their physical characteristics, with some errors.
Require assistance to identify examples of environmental changes that have allowed some species to survive and caused others to become extinct.
Make vague connections between adaptations and survival rate.
Demonstrate major misconceptions regarding classification.
Have little success in relating environmental changes to the survival or extinction of some species.
Provide no evidence of being able to relate adaptation and survival rates.
48
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade: 5 Content Standard 10.0
Earth Structures and Composition: Students understand that the Earth is composed of interrelated systems of rocks, water, air, and life.
· · · · Classify rock samples into self-generated categories on the basis of easily observed properties of the minerals they contain.
Develop a model which can be used to show how one variable (e.g., slope, soil consistency, amount of rainfall, plant coverage) influences erosion rate.
Use maps to describe the locations of various topographical features (e.g., specific mountain ranges, canyons, trenches) on continents and the ocean floor.
Given samples of soil, relate the composition of the soil to its origin.
Describe the mineral content of a rock sample in terms of easily observed properties of the minerals it contains (e.g., color/darkness of minerals, size of crystals).
Describe relationships, using models and references to first-hand observations, between increase in slope and increase in erosion rate; increase in slope and decrease in deposition rate; and the ways in which man's activities can increase erosion rates (e.g., deforestation and soil removal) or decrease erosion rates (e.g., reforestation or minimum-impact construction).
Describe, using models or maps, flat, protruding, and depressed features of the Earth's surface, including features of the ocean floor.
Describe the composition of samples of soil in terms of constituents (e.g., rock/mineral fragments, organic material, moisture content, organisms); compare and contrast soil samples from different places.
Give some inaccurate descriptions of easily observed properties of minerals contained in a rock sample.
Make a narrow range of connections between rates of erosion/deposition and factors which influence those rates.
Incompletely describe topographical features (e.g., do not include those found on the ocean floor).
Describe soil samples, but may not include significant constituents of that soil; make comparisons of soil that are unclear.
Are unable to describe accurately any easily observed properties of minerals found in a rock sample.
Have limited or no success in making connections between rates of erosion/deposition and factors which influence those rates.
Describe topographical features with only rudimentary detail.
Are unable to describe constituents of soil samples or to make comparisons between different samples of soil.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
· ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · · ·
49
Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 5 Content Standard 11.0
Earth Models: Students understand that the Earth may be represented by a variety of maps and models.
· · Interpret data shown on different kinds of maps, including local, state, and national road maps, as well as precipitation, temperature, and vegetation maps; interpret Arial photos.
Use the Nevada state road map to calculate distances and times between various points of interest in the state; construct a map of local features with extensive details (e.g., a key, a scale).
Identify, given a map, the directions northeast, northwest, southeast, and southwest.
Use the Nevada state road map to plan a route between various points of interest in the state (e.g., plan a route from their home to an interesting feature like the Berlin Ichthyosaur or Lehmann Caves), with minimal assistance; construct a map of a local or regional feature (e.g., the classroom, school grounds, or neighborhood), with minimal assistance.
Inconsistently identify north, south, east, and west on a map.
Use the Nevada state road map to plan a route between various points of interest in the state, with some illogical errors; construct a map of a local or regional feature which lacks some necessary details.
Are unable to identify north, south, east, or west on a map.
Attempt to use the Nevada state road map to plan a route between various points of interest in the state, but the route contains serious errors; construct a mostly inaccurate map of a local or regional feature.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· ·
BELOW STANDARD
· ·
50
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 5 Content Standard 12.0
Earth History: Students understand that Earth systems (such as weather and mountain formation) may change or vary.
· · · · Identify processes and classify the rates of change that occurred in the formation of a landform.
Use fossil evidence, such as similarities to present-day organisms, tracks and trails, to infer how a particular prehistoric creature lived.
Compare and contrast, using various laboratory, print, multimedia, and Internet resources, the amount of time required to cause various changes on the surface of the Earth (e.g., weathering, erosion, earthquakes, volcanic eruptions).
Simulate, using hands-on materials, and describe the various ways that fossils form (e.g., cast/mold formation, imprints) with minimal assistance.
Provide some unrealistic rates for various changes on the surface of the Earth.
Simulate and describe, with limited success, the various ways that fossils form.
Provide mostly unrealistic rates for various changes on the surface of the Earth.
Are unable to simulate or describe the various ways that fossils form.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
· · · ·
51
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 5 Content Standard 13.0
Earth and Space Sciences: Students understand that Earth systems have a variety of cycles through which energy and matter continuously flow.
· Explain, using first-hand observations where appropriate: · that the sun is a useful source of energy for cooking or generating electricity · that the sun provides energy for plant growth.
· that low-grade coal or peat is derived from plant material.
· how the sun is the ultimate source of energy for fossil fuels.
· wood or coal burnt and the energy released measured.
Correlate local weather to regional patterns by collecting data from a school weather station, newspapers or the Internet.
Observe pressure and relative humidity and use the observations to predict or explain local weather.
Design experiments to apply to a natural or artificial system that would test the predicted effects of changing a variable in that system.
Investigate and explain, with examples, how the sun is the main source of energy for people.
Analyze, using print, maps, models, multimedia resources, and the Internet, various meteorological events (e.g., storms, flooding, drought), including their causes and effects.
Conduct investigations that demonstrate relationships among temperature, relative humidity, air movement, and rates of evaporation and condensation.
Observe natural (outdoor) and artificial systems, (e.g., terraria, decomposition columns, aquaria, stream tables, gardens, school environments) and describe the physical changes, (e.g., pH, temperature, relative humidity, changes in state of water, weathering, erosion) and biological changes (e.g., patterns of behavior, seasonal changes in form) that take place in those systems.
Identify the sun as the main source of energy for people, but do not explain its role with sufficient detail or provide good examples.
Provide a narrow range of descriptions of meteorological events.
Collect data from investigations, but partially misinterpret the data.
Provides a narrow range of descriptions of changes in systems.
May identify the sun as the main source of energy, but do not explain its role and provide examples.
Provide insufficient descriptions of meteorological events.
Have difficulty collecting and seriously misinterpret data.
Are unable to provide descriptions of changes in systems.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· · · MEETS STANDARD · · · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
52
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Science Grade 5 Content Standard 14.0
Earth and Space Sciences: Students understand that the Earth is part of a planetary system within the Milky Way galaxy, which is part of the known universe.
· · Build a model or draw a picture representing the solar system, which correctly portrays the relative orbits of planets around the sun.
Explain observations of the sun and moon in the sky by citing the rotation of the Earth and the revolution of the moon about the Earth; locate a common constellation in the sky, record its location over several months, and explain that different stars can be seen in different seasons.
Investigate and compare the sun and stars, using a variety of resources; demonstrate the relationship of distance to apparent size and brightness (e.g., place light source at different distances and describe its apparent sizes and brightness' and how this model helps to explain the appearances of the sun and stars from Earth.)
Compare and contrast, citing print, multimedia, or Internet resources, the general features of planets and their moons, asteroids, comets, and the sun.
Describe, citing daily and nightly observations, or simulations (e.g., classroom ceiling star projector, college planetarium), the motion of the sun, moon, stars, and some planets across the sky.
Describe, citing daily and nightly observations, or simulations (e.g., classroom ceiling star projector, college planetarium), the distribution, brightness, and color of some major stars and constellations.
Compare and contrast the general features of objects in the solar system, but descriptions are incomplete or erroneous.
Give descriptions of the motion of objects in the sky, which omit some key details.
Give descriptions of the distribution, brightness, and color of some major stars and constellations, which omit a few key details or contain some inaccuracies.
Compare and contrast, with little or no success, the general features of objects in the solar system.
Give descriptions, which are incomplete and erroneous, of the motion of objects in the sky.
Describe, in a vague and confusing manner, the distribution, brightness, and color of major stars and constellations.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
·
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
53
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 5 Content Standard 15.0 Ecosystems: Students will demonstrate an understanding that ecosystems display patterns of organization, change, and stability as a result of the interactions and interdependencies among the life forms and the physical components of the Earth.
· · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · Analyze a specific habitat and identify producers, consumers, and decomposers, and diagram or illustrate their interactions.
Investigate and explain why plants and animals will survive well, less well, or will not survive at all in a particular environment; use specific examples.
Trace the energy flow through a selected ecosystem and identify other requirements for life that are met by the environment.
Compare a local ecosystem with another ecosystem in the state, region, or nation.
Describe, using examples, several ways organisms interact with each other and with their non-living habitat, including dead plants and animals.
Match plants and animals that will survive well, less well, or will not survive at all to particular environments.
Explain why energy is required in an ecosystem, identify the sun as the energy source for most, and identify other requirements for life that are met by the environment.
List and describe unique characteristics of representative local ecosystems.
Describe a few ways organisms interact with each other and with their nonliving habitat.
Identify, with some errors, plants and animals that will survive well, less well, or will not survive at all in a particular environment.
Identify the sun as the energy source for most ecosystems but are not able to describe clearly the role of energy in ecosystems.
Describe, with assistance, unique characteristics of a local ecosystem.
Describe superficially and/or inaccurately ways organisms interact with each other and with their non-living habitat.
Are unable to identify plants and animals that will survive, well, less well, or will not survive at all in a particular environment.
Are not able to describe why energy is required in an ecosystem and that the sun is the primary energy source for most.
Are able to provide only a minimal description of a local ecosystem, if at all.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
54
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 5 Content Standard 16.0 Natural Resources: Students demonstrate and understand that natural resources include renewable and non-renewable materials and energy.
All organisms, including human, use resources to maintain and improve their existence, and the use of resources can have positive and negative consequences.
EXCEEDS STANDARD · Compare and contrast the uses of materials that have similar properties, and explain why the uses are appropriate for one material and not the other.
Use print, multimedia, and Internet resources to describe current efforts to design longer-lasting or more efficient machines, and how new designs can lead to more efficient uses of resources (e.g., ergonomics, miniaturization); redesign an existing machine (e.g., a toy) or process so that it uses fewer materials or less energy.
Describe, using a map of Nevada and information from state and federal agencies (e.g., the Department of Business and Industry, Department of Wildlife, State Parks, Bureau of Land Management), the locations and uses of natural resources acquired in Nevada (e.g., water, gold, gypsum, petroleum, ranch and farm land, recreation land, wildlife); and the locations of natural resources acquired outside the state (e.g., lumber, grain, fish, coal).
Compare and contrast, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, the consumptive habits and patterns of resource use in developing and industrialized countries.
Observe samples of various materials (e.g., wood, cloth, paper, metal, plastic, composites), and describe their properties (e.g., how they respond to various stresses, how they react with other materials/chemicals, what happens in the presence of heat/fire, electrical and magnetic properties); identify ways that observed properties of samples of materials make them useful for various human activities.
Investigate and describe the extent to which samples of man-made items (e.g., objects made of cloth, glass, paper, metal, plastic, composites, ceramics) can be used over and over; describe how a device can be made to operate with less energy (e.g., reducing friction by applying a lubricant such as graphite, using more aerodynamic and/or lightweight materials).
Describe, using information from state and federal agencies (e.g., the Department of Business and Industry, Department of Wildlife, State Parks, Bureau of Land Management), the kinds and uses of natural resources found in Nevada (e.g., water, gold, gypsum, petroleum, ranch and farm land, recreation land, wildlife); describe, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, the kinds and uses of natural resources acquired nationally or globally (e.g., lumber, grain, fish, coal).
Contrast personal basic minimal resource needs (food/water, shelter, warmth) to actual resource use; suggest ways in which personal use of limited resources could be reduced.
Observe and describe properties, with a few errors or omissions, but have difficulty relating properties to applications.
Describe how technology can be used to extend resources in general terms, but provide weak examples.
Describe Nevada's natural resources and uses, as well as significant resources acquired out-ofstate, but omit some essential information.
Make contrasts that are somewhat incomplete or erroneous.
Inadequately observe and describe properties; are unable to relate properties to applications.
Are unable to provide a coherent explanation of how technology can be used to extend resources.
Do not distinguish or describe adequately Nevada's natural resources and those acquired out-ofstate.
May confuse "needs" and "wants"; contrasts are inaccurate.
·
·
· MEETS STANDARD ·
·
·
· APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · ·
55
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 5 Content Standard 17.0 Conservation: Students understand that humans have the unique ability to change personal and societal behavior based on ethical considerations regarding other organisms, the planet as a whole, and future generations.
· · · Investigate and compare and contrast examples of people living in the same time period with very different patterns of consumption.
Give a comprehensive description of components in an ecosystem that can be observed to change and components that do not change.
Explain that changes in environments can be natural events or influenced by human activities; cite specific examples and describe differences in long-term effects, if any.
Describe how the consumption patterns of people living in the same time period vary from place to place.
Describe components of an ecosystem that can be observed to change and components that do not change.
Identify changes in environments as being natural events or influenced by human activities.
Require assistance to identify differences in the consumption patterns of people.
Partially identify components in an ecosystem that can be observed to change and components that do not change.
Identify, with some assistance, changes in environments as being natural events or influenced by human activities.
Have little success in identifying that consumption patterns of people vary from place to place.
Are unable to differentiate the components in an ecosystem that can be observed to change from those components that do not change.
Are unable to differentiate changes in environments caused by natural events from those influenced by human activities.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
BELOW
STANDARD
· · ·
56
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 5 Content Standard 18.0 Scientific, Historical, and Technological Perspectives: Students understand that humans have the unique ability to change personal and societal behavior based on ethical considerations regarding other organisms, the planet as a whole, and future generations.
(Nature of Science, Attributes of Scientific Research, The History of Science and Invention, Technology, The Dynamic Character of Scientific Knowledge, Scientific Ethics) · · · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · Develop a generalized approach to solving problems systematically.
Use actual observations and results of scientific investigations to form a possible explanation and new questions.
Research and use biographical information to make a written or oral report on past discoveries and inventions and relate the research to the natural world.
Demonstrate the benefits of collaboration by working together toward a common goal.
Can accurately use technological devices which can measure motion.
Identify relevant questions for further study while doing scientific investigations.
Develop a systematic approach to solving a problem.
Use actual observations and results of scientific investigation to form a possible explanation.
Research and use biographical information to make a written or oral report that describes past discoveries and inventions.
Explain, with multiple examples, that working on a team brings greater results than working alone, (e.g., Apollo 13, Thomas Edison's work on the light bulb).
Use technological devices which can be used to determine motion (e.g., stop watches, radar guns).
Identify a question for further study while doing a scientific investigation (e.g., factors affecting plant growth).
Explain that science is a logical process of coming up with an answer to a question Attempt to use actual observations and results of scientific investigation to form possible explanations.
Research and use biographical information to make a written or oral report on a past discovery or invention.
Describe that working on a team brings greater results than working alone.
Have difficulty manipulating technological devices to measure motion.
Can describe that science is an ongoing process but cannot relate follow-up questions to a specific investigation.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
57
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 5 (Standard 18.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Have difficulty in grasping the logic of a scientific process that answers a question Cannot connect actual observations and results of a scientific investigation to form a possible explanation.
With teacher assistance, use information supplied by the teacher to describe a past discovery or invention.
Characterize science as being done by individuals because credit is often attributed to individuals.
Cannot use technological devices which can measure motion.
Do not perceive science as an ongoing process.
58
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 5 Content Standard 19.0
Reasoning and Critical Response Skills: Students understand that many decisions require critical consideration and scientific evidence.
· · · · · · Justify fully developed conclusions or explanations by use of well organized data and logical argument.
Insightful recognition of the limits of generalizations, assumptions, analogies and models.
Justify conclusions or explanations by use of data and logical argument.
Recognize the limits of generalizations, assumptions, analogies and models.
(e.g. solar system, evolution, model of atom...)
Needs development in drawing conclusions or explanations by use of data and logical argument.
Unable to justify conclusions or explanations by use of data and logical argument.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD APPROACHES STANDARD BELOW STANDARD
59
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 5 Content Standard 20.0
Systems, Models, Risk, and Predictions: Students understand that a variety of models can be used to describe or predict things and events.
· · · Construct a physical model and use it to explain a process that happens too quickly or too slowly for easy observation or is difficult to manipulate directly, (e.g., make clay land forms and use a stream table to demonstrate erosion).
Explain, with compelling examples, that the probability of an event happening depends on how closely present conditions match previous conditions.
Explain that the validity of predictions depend on the size of the sample.
Describe and compare the components and interrelationships of a simple system accurately and with clarifying diagram(s).
Use a physical model to explain how something works or is constructed.
Explain with examples that the probability of an event happening depends on how closely present conditions match previous conditions (e.g., weather, accidents).
Describe and compare the components and interrelationships of a simple system (e.g. tracing the flow of water through an aquarium, a filter and a pump).
Attempt to use a physical model to explain how something works or is constructed but explanation is seriously flawed or incomplete.
Describe in general terms that some events are more likely to happen than others.
Lack the necessary detail in describing and comparing the components and interrelationships of a simple system.
Have little success in developing a physical model to explain how something works or is constructed.
Are unable to articulate basic concepts about probability.
Cannot identify the components of a simple system and how they interact.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · ·
60
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 5 Content Standard 21.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · Scientific Values and Attitudes: Students understand that science is an active process of systematically examining the natural world.
Keep accurate records of investigations and observations and do not change those records after the fact.
Make conscientious observations and test things more than once, using multiple trials to verify results.
Offer insightful reasons for their findings and weigh alternative reasons and suggestions, before drawing a conclusion.
Keep accurate records of investigations and observations without changing those records later (i.e., do not change records to fit the norm).
Make conscientious observations and test things more than once; use repeated observations or trials to verify results.
Offer reasons for their findings and consider suggestions by others.
Keep incomplete records of investigations and observations, and on occasion, may change records after the fact.
Make unclear observations and seldom use repeated observations to verify results.
Occasionally offer reasons for their findings and often misinterpret or fail to consider suggestions by others in the context of an investigation.
Keep incomplete records of investigations, if at all, and sometimes make changes after the fact.
Have little success in making accurate observations and do not test findings more than once.
Offer few reasons for their findings and generally ignore suggestions by others.
61
Science Performance Level Descriptors Communication Skills Grade 5 Content Standard 22.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · Communication Skills: Students understand that a variety of communication methods can be used to share scientific information.
Provide clear written and oral instructions that others are able to follow consistently.
Organize information into charts, tables, and graphs so as to make patterns and relationships readily apparent.
Provide leadership to a collaborative group project.
Provide written or oral instructions that others are able to follow.
Organize information into charts, tables, and graphs according to established criteria.
Collaborate on a group project.
Write or give oral instructions that others find difficult to follow.
Organize information into charts, tables, and graphs, but labels, categories, and entries are often incorrect.
Need assistance in collaborating on a group project.
Write or give oral instructions that others are unable to follow.
Can organize information into charts, tables, and graphs, only with sustained teacher assistance.
Have little success collaborating on a group project.
62
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 5 Content Standard 23.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · Scientific Applications of Mathematics: Students understand that scientific inquiry is enhanced and often communicated by using mathematics.
Investigate the changes in the result of a simple experiment when they alter systematically each of several variables in turn.
Conceptualize and explain how to solve a group of related problems.
Make acceptable quantitative estimates of unfamiliar lengths, weights and time intervals and check them by measurements.
Consistently select a unit for a particular measurement which is appropriate in kind and magnitude.
Consistently recognize that there may be variations when everyone in the class makes a particular measurement, and explain the reasons for the variations.
Investigate the change in the result of a simple experiment when they alter one of the experimental conditions (e.g., How will the length of the string affect the "swing" of a pendulum?).
Can generally explain the strategy and thinking they used to solve a particular problem.
Make acceptable quantitative estimates of familiar lengths, weights, and time intervals and check them by measurements.
Usually select the appropriate types of units for a particular measurement (e.g., meters for length, seconds for time, and kilograms for mass) and the appropriate magnitude of units for a particular measurement (e.g., meters, not centimeters, for measuring swimming pools).
Generally recognize that there may be variations when everyone in the class makes a particular measurement, but inconsistently explain why.
Attempt to use a simple experiment to investigate the change in the result when they alter one of the experimental conditions.
Attempt to explain strategies and thinking used to solve problems, but have difficulty explaining steps they have used.
Make quantitative estimates of familiar lengths, weights and time intervals and check them by measurements but make multiple errors in estimating and/or measuring.
Have difficulty using the appropriate unit for a particular measurement.
Recognize that there may be variations when everyone in the class makes a particular measurement but do not know why.
· APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · ·
63
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 5 (Standard 23.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · Can describe a cause/effect relationship but do not grasp the concept of a controlled experiment.
Mostly unable to explain strategies and thinking used to solve problems.
Attempt to make quantitative estimates and/or measurements of familiar lengths, weights, and time intervals, but estimates and measurements have significant errors.
Inaccurately choose the appropriate unit for a particular measurement.
Mostly lack recognition that there may be variations when everyone in the class makes a particular measurement.
64
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 5 Content Standard 24.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · Laboratory Skills and Safety: Students can appropriately and safely apply the tools and techniques of scientific inquiry.
Consistently use safety equipment and attire and remind peers to do so.
Accurately measure and mix dry and liquid material safely in prescribed amounts.
Use provided materials effectively and efficiently to construct objects for a particular task.
Consistently label measurements, graphs, and diagrams correctly.
Select and use, effectively and efficiently, a range of instruments to measure physical quantities and record and store data.
Figure out how to manipulate objects to test variables in an experiment and observe events to form conclusions.
Consistently use safety equipment and attire.
Generally measure and mix dry and liquid materials safely in prescribed amounts.
Properly use provided materials to construct objects for a particular task.
Generally label measurements, graphs, and diagrams correctly.
Select and use a range of instruments to measure physical quantities (e.g., length, volume, weight, time, temperature) and record data using traditional lab equipment as well as computers.
Given a set procedure can manipulate objects and observe events in an experiment.
Use safety equipment and attire, when reminded.
Measure and mix dry and liquid material safely in prescribed amounts, with teacher assistance.
Use provided materials to construct objects for a particular task, with teacher assistance.
Make errors labeling measurements, graphs, and diagrams correctly.
On occasion make inappropriate selections of instruments to measure physical quantities and have some difficulty in recording data.
Can manipulate objects and observe events in an experiment with teacher support.
65
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 5 (Standard 24.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Fail to use safety equipment and attire.
Have major difficulty measuring and mixing dry and liquid materials safely in prescribed amounts, even with direct supervision.
Have little success in use of provided materials to construct objects for a particular task.
Label measurements and diagrams incompletely or incorrectly.
Generally make inappropriate selections of, and have difficulty using, instruments.
Have little success in manipulating objects and observing events in an experiment, even with teacher support.
66
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 8 Content Standards 1.0
Forces and Motion: Students understand that forces such as gravitational, electrical, and magnetic influence the motion of objects.
· · · Predict what will happen if more than one force acts on an object along a straight line and the forces reinforce or oppose one another, depending upon their direction and magnitude.
Explain and qualitatively interpret the relationship F m1m2/r_ using very small and very large masses and distances.
Explain the relationship among work, force, and distance and how simple machines change force and distance through which work is done, using multiple examples; identify which simple machine would be most efficient in moving a particular object, design and use a simple machine to solve a problem.
Correctly predict the relative buoyancy of different objects and demonstrate the relationship between buoyancy and the apparent weight of an object in liquid.
Design and/or build a model to demonstrate and explain the relationship between electricity and magnetism (e.g., electromagnet, simple electric motor).
Explain how multiple forces acting on an object along a straight line will affect the motion of the object (e.g., the forces may be acting in the same direction or in opposite directions; the forces may be of equal magnitude or different magnitudes; or the object may be in motion or at rest).
Explain that every object in the Universe is attracted to every other object in the Universe and that the larger the masses, the greater the force of attraction, and that the greater the distance between the objects, the weaker the force of attraction.
Use a simple machine to solve a problem(e.g., moving an object from one place to another) and describe how simple machines change force and distance through which work is done.
Describe the relationship between buoyancy and the apparent weight of an object in liquid.
Investigate using direct observations, and describe that electric current produces magnetic forces, and moving magnets produce electric forces in conductors.
Have difficulty explaining how multiple forces acting on an object affect the motion of an object.
Describe the basic concept of gravity, but inconsistently apply it.
Describe the relationship among work, force, distance, and how simple machines work incorrectly; can use a simple machine to solve a problem, with limited assistance.
Have some difficulty explaining the relationship between buoyancy and the apparent weight of an object in liquid.
Can describe the relationship between electricity and magnetism.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· ·
MEETS STANDARD
·
· · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · ·
67
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 8 (Standard 1.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Are unable to explain how multiple forces acting on an object affect the motion of an object.
Cannot identify gravity as the force that causes objects to fall or planets to orbit.
Even with teacher support are unable to use a simple machine to solve a problem.
Are unable to make a connection among work, force, distance, and simple machines and/or even with teacher support use a simple machine to solve a problem.
Are unable to explain the relationship between buoyancy and the apparent weight of an object in liquid.
Are unable to describe the relationship between electricity and magnetism.
68
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 8 Content Standard 2.0 Structure and Properties of Matter: Students understand that materials have distinct properties which depend on the amount of matter present, its chemical composition, and structure.
· · · Use a simple model to explain differences among solids, liquids, and gases, what happens in phase changes, and what happens when a solid dissolves in a liquid.
Distinguish among a variety of substances by measuring their intrinsic properties.
Use two-and three-dimensional models to explain how atoms come together to form individual molecules (e.g., one water molecule or group of molecules to form liquid water), and identify limitations of the models; explain the meaning of chemical formulas in quantitative terms.
Draw models of simple atoms, indicating the appropriate position of protons, electrons, and neutrons and explain the significance of the atomic number with it.
Explain, model or diagram how the movement of particles determines whether a substance is a solid, liquid, or gas and predict how changes in temperature and pressure individually affect each state.
Explain, with appropriate analogies, that all known living and non-living substances are composed of elements and develop a hierarchical concept map to explain the relationships among elements, compounds, mixtures, and solutions, using examples.
Use simple models (e.g., particle models) and measurements to explain observed properties of matter.
Separate substances based on their physical and chemical properties (e.g., color, solubility, chemical reactivity, melting point, boiling point).
Use models or diagrams to describe how atoms form molecules.
Explain that all atoms consist of protons, electrons and neutrons.
Explain three states of matter (solids, liquids, and gasses) as systems of particles of varying densities and degrees of organization.
Explain with examples how atoms of different elements can combine to form all known substances.
Can use a simple model to describe differences in the states of matter.
Are able to identify various physical and chemical properties but are unable to use these properties to distinguish between substances.
Have difficulty in using diagrams to depict molecules and/or interpreting simple chemical formulas, with some teacher support.
Confuse the characteristics of protons, electrons and neutrons in the structure of atoms.
Identify the three states of matter as systems of particles but are not sure of patterns.
State that elements can combine to form various substances, but are unable to explain how.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· · ·
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · ·
69
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 8 (Standard 2.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Are unable Are unable Are unable formula.
Are unable Are unable Are unable molecules, to use models to illustrate the states of matter.
to identify various physical and chemical properties of matter.
to identify the quantitative relationship between atoms in a chemical to identify the components of an atom. to explain the three states of matter in terms of particles.
to identify any relationship between atoms, elements, compounds, and mixtures.
70
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 8 Content Standard 3.0 Students understand that changes in temperature and pressure can alter states of matter.
Energy exists in many forms, and one form can change into another.
· · · Given certain objects, correctly predict the relative rate at which heat will move from one object to the other; distinguish among conduction, radiation, and convection.
Investigate and diagram a heating or cooling curve identifying the energy changes for a specific substance that are taking place; interpret the relationship: heat = mass x specific heat x change in temperature.
Demonstrate the characteristics of waves using such things as ropes, water tables, and springs, and explain that waves move at different speeds in different materials; draw a diagram of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of changing wavelengths.
Predict the characteristics of various circuits and design a circuit using certain specifications.
Create a system with a minimum of four different forms of energy (radiant, chemical, electrical, nuclear, and mechanical) changing form (i.e., illustrating energy transformation pathways); diagram a chemical or physical process, identifying changes in potential or kinetic energy; describe kinetic and gravitational potential energy in qualitative and quantitative terms, using examples.
Describe the movement of heat from object to object incorporating the concepts of composition and proximity of the objects; identify in general terms which kinds of substances will conduct heat most readily.
Describe the specific energy changes that must occur for a substance to change states using such terms as, melting point, boiling point, etc. (e.g., diagram a heating or cooling curve identifying the phase changes that are taking place).
Investigate and describe the characteristics of waves using such things as ropes, water tables, and springs; describe that waves move at different speeds in different materials, using examples such as sound waves traveling in air as opposed to water; describe the electromagnetic spectrum and how wavelength changes from one end to the other; describe that the energy of waves can be changed into other forms of energy.
Create parallel, series and combination circuits; describe very simple properties of parallel and combination circuits (e.g., in these circuits, there are branches and current is distributed among the branches) and more sophisticated properties of series circuits (e.g., voltage, resistance, current).
Describe various ways energy can be transferred between systems or objects and the different forms of energy (radiant, chemical, electrical, nuclear, and mechanical).
Distinguish between potential and kinetic energy; give specific examples of each.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· ·
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
·
· ·
71
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 8 (Standard 3.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Are unable to correctly relate the movement of heat to the composition or proximity of objects.
State the difference between heat and temperature but may not be able to provide examples; can carry out phase change investigations, but are unable to interpret the results.
Are unable to accurately describe the nature of waves, including the transfer of energy and how waves are affected by movement through different materials.
Are unable to construct or adequately describe among parallel, series, and combination circuits.
Are unable to partially describe all of the various ways energy can be transferred and transformed.
Distinguish between potential and kinetic energy, with inaccuracies in the examples cited.
Are unable to identify any relationship between the movement of heat and the composition or proximity of objects.
Are unable to distinguish heat and temperature and/ or describe a relationship between energy change and phase change.
Are unable to correctly describe the characteristics and/or behavior of waves correctly.
Are unable to identify a circuit as a parallel or series circuit.
Are mostly unable to identify various forms of energy or explain the transfer of energy.
Are unable to identify the difference between kinetic and potential energy; are unable to give examples of either kinetic or potential energy.
72
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 8 Content Standard 4.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Chemical Reaction: Students understand that chemical reactions change substances into different substances.
· · · Summarize and Describe the significance of Lavoisier's experiment; apply the law of conservation of mass to chemical reactions.
Use the concept of atoms to explain the conservation of mass.
Design simple investigations to test the effect of changing particle size, temperature, light and pH on chemical reactions; give examples of reactions that vary in rate from instantaneous to infinitesimally slow.
Observe and describe reactions which overall either require energy or release energy; give multiple examples of endothermic and exothermic reactions; relate the macroscopic changes (i.e., energy required or released) to what is happening on the microscopic level (i.e., the atomic level).
Describe the basic arrangement of elements in the periodic table; predict trends in the properties of elements across rows and down families (e.g., relative size of atoms, reactivity, etc.)
Describe the behavior of exceptional elements (i.e., hydrogen and oxygen).
Apply the concept of the conservation of mass to a given chemical reactions specifying the total mass of reactants and products; confirm that the same elements are present in the product(s) as were present in the reactants.
Carry out simple investigations and describe how the rate of a reaction can be changed when variables such as temperature, pH, and light are changed; give examples of applications of this concept such as storing certain substances in brown bottles, refrigeration, the effect of acid rain.
Observe and describe, using commonplace examples, chemical reactions which overall either require or release energy.
Describe the basic organization of the periodic table and describe patterns (i.e., location of metals, nonmetals, metalloids, noble gases) and chemical reactivity.
Can sometimes apply the concept of the conservation of mass to chemical reactions; can generally confirm that the same elements are present in the product(s) as were present in the reactants.
Identify at least one variable that affects the rate of a reaction, but cannot describe how the knowledge could be applied.
Have difficulty relating the concept of energy to chemical reactions, or giving examples.
Can identify some overall patterns but are inconsistently able to predict common properties of elements using the periodic table (e.g., ionization tendency, relative size of atoms, reactivity, state of matter, electronegativity).
·
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
· · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · ·
73
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 8 (Standard 4.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · Inaccurately apply the concept of conservation of mass to chemical reactions.
Are unable to describe a relationship between the rate of a chemical reaction and variables such as pH and temperature.
Are unable to relate the concept of energy to chemical reactions.
Are unable to identify any patterns in the properties of elements in the periodic table.
74
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 8 Content Standard 5.0 Nuclear Energy and Electromagnetic Energy: Students understand that nuclear energy and electromagnetic energy are produced from both natural and human-made sources in many forms.
· · · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · Demonstrate the following properties of light: traveling in straight lines, reflection, refraction, transmission, absorption, and scattering.
Demonstrate the concept of half-life using models or manipulatives (e.g., beans and pie charts) and calculate the answers to simple half-life problems.
Research the environmental impact associated with high-level and low-level nuclear wastes; cite actual case studies and credit sources.
Use a prism to demonstrate and explain the Sun's visible spectrum; show where visible light falls within the electromagnetic spectrum.
Describe existing or potential applications of nuclear processing such as fusion and fission.
Create an analogy of how nuclear reactions convert small amounts of matter into a relatively large amount of energy; explain E = mc_. Investigate and describe the interaction of light with matter (e.g., transmission, absorption, scattering of light).
Explain what is meant by radioactive isotopes and describe their application to medicine, age dating and nuclear power plants).
Define high-level and low-level nuclear wastes and describe their associated hazards.
Describe the electromagnetic spectrum; qualitatively identify the waves produced by the Sun within the electromagnetic spectrum.
Compare and contrast the nuclear processes that occur in the Sun and other stars (fusion) with nuclear reactors (fission).
Explain how nuclear reactions convert small amounts of matter into a relatively large amount of energy; cite examples.
Investigate the interaction of light with matter, but describe the behavior of light incompletely or inaccurately.
Have difficulty defining radioactive isotopes and/or describing applications in a lucid manner.
Do not distinguish between high-level and low-level nuclear wastes and/or fail to identify their major associated hazards.
Have difficulty identifying the waves produced by the Sun within the electromagnetic spectrum.
Compare and contrast the nuclear processes that occur in the Sun and other stars with nuclear reactors but omit essential information or report it inaccurately.
Have difficulty explaining how nuclear reactions convert small amounts of matter into a relatively large amount of energy.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
75
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 8 (Standard 5.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Are unable to describe the interaction of light with matter.
Are unable to define and identify any applications for radioactive isotopes.
Are unable to distinguish between high-level and low-level nuclear waste and identify their major hazards.
Are unable to describe the electromagnetic spectrum.
Are unable to distinguish between nuclear fission and fusion.
Are unable to describe how nuclear reactions convert small amounts of matter into a relatively large amount of energy.
76
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 8 Content Standard 6.0 Structure and Function: Students understand that all life forms, at all levels of organization, use specialized structures and similar processes to meet life's needs.
· · · · MEETS STANDARD · · Correctly and accurately analyze disease processes as breakdowns in structures and functions or organisms, and illustrate this principle with multiple examples of a range of diseases.
Provide multiple, accurate examples of life processes occurring at different levels of organization (cells, tissues, organs, systems).
Accurately identify and describe specialized plant structures and systems and relate them to their functions.
Uses specific vocabulary to accurately explain how cellular functions are guided by information stored in DNA.
Explain with minimal assistance that diseases result from breakdowns in the structures or functions of an organism.
Explain, with an example, that life functions may occur at different levels of organization through specialized tissues, organs, and systems; for example: oxygen is exchanged at the lungs, transported in the blood, and used by the body's cells.
Identify various plant structures and systems, giving the function of each with minimal errors.
Explain, in general terms, that cellular functions are guided by information stored in DNA.
Require substantial assistance to recognize that diseases disrupt bodily functions.
Display limited understanding of the relationship between cells, tissues, and systems.
Identify various plant structures and systems giving the function of each with significant errors.
Explain that cellular functions are guided by information stored in DNA but important details are missing.
Demonstrate limited understanding that disease processes disrupt bodily functions.
Exhibit serious misconceptions about the relationship between cells, tissues, and systems.
Demonstrate little or no success in identifying plant structures or functions.
Provide incomplete explanation which lacks details or contains major errors.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · ·
77
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 8 Content Standard 7.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · Internal and External Influences on Organisms: Students understand that organisms respond to internal and external influences.
Research, using print and electronic media, how scientists go about determining whether specific behaviors are innate or learned (e.g., recent studies with primates, rodents, birds, etc.).
Explain how behavior may be based on experience and/or evolutionary history, illustrate with well-developed examples.
Investigate stimulus-response and describe how it applies to both plant and animal behaviors, citing specific examples.
Explain and give specific examples of how various viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites may infect the human body and interfere with its functions.
Identify a given behavior as innate or learned, provide multiple, accurate examples of innate and learned behavior.
Explain that behavior may be based on experience and/or evolutionary history, but provide weak examples.
Accurately relate a given behavior to the stimulus that prompted it.
Explain that various viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites may infect the human body and interfere with its functions; give an example of each.
Inconsistently identify given behaviors as innate or learned.
State that behavior may be based on experience and/or evolutionary history but are unable to illustrate with appropriate examples.
Relate a behavior to a given stimulus on a limited basis.
Provide an explanation (lacking necessary detail) that various viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites may infect the human body and interfere with its functions.
Cannot identify behaviors as innate or learned.
Inaccurately describe that behavior may be based on experience and/or evolutionary history.
Vaguely relate behavior to stimulus.
Provide a minimal explanation that various viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites may infect the human body and interfere with its functions.
78
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 8 Content Standard 8.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Heredity and Diversity: Students understand that life forms are diverse, and that they pass some characteristics to their offspring.
· · · · · · Explain, using diagrams, charts, and examples, how Mendel's experiments on heredity formed the foundation for the study of genetics.
Independently classify living things on the basis of similar characteristics and tell why certain organisms are grouped together, construct a dichotomous key to separate them into homogenous group.
Discuss the relationship between phenotypic variation in a species and selective breeding.
Demonstrate with illustrative diagrams, the difference between the processes and results of asexual and sexual reproduction, relate to asexual propagation of plants and cloning.
Predict the probability of particular traits for a single gene cross (e.g., sickle cell disease, PTC tasting), given the genotype of the parents.
Provide a fully developed description of a species and give examples of interspecies mating which results in nonfertile offspring, compare pairs of animals (e.g., horse/donkey; Chihuahua/Great Dane) and identify whether they belong to the same species.
Explain and give examples of how changes in the genes of sex cells may affect offspring.
Adequately explain how Mendel's model of heredity predicts the passage of genetic instructions from one generation to another.
Classify given examples of living things on the basis of similar characteristics and tell why certain organisms are grouped together.
Explain that selective breeding has resulted in new varieties of domestic animals and plants, cite examples of both plants and animals.
Distinguish between processes involved in sexual and asexual reproduction.
Demonstrate that pairs of genes may control patterns of inheritance (e.g., use Punnett squares).
Describe species as organisms that can mate with each other and produce fertile offspring.
Explain that changes in the genes of sex cells may affect offspring.
· MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · ·
79
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade: 8 (Standard 8.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · · Provide an incomplete or inaccurate explanation that heredity is the passage of genetic instructions from one generation to another that is incomplete or inaccurate.
Classify given examples of living things on the basis of similar characteristics and tell why certain organisms are grouped together, with minor errors.
Describe, in general terms, selective breeding but have difficulty using the concept to explain new varieties of plants and animals.
Describe the processes of sexual and asexual reproduction incompletely or with some minor errors.
Demonstrate that pairs of genes may control patterns of inheritance, with some errors.
Provide a vague definition of a species or inaccurate examples.
Explain that changes in the gene of sex cells may affect offspring.
Demonstrate little or no understanding that heredity is the passage of genetic instructions from one generation to another.
Makes major errors in classifying and provides inadequate rationale for groupings.
Are unable to describe and connect the concept to the production of new varieties of animals and plants.
Are unable to distinguish between the processes involved in sexual and asexual reproduction.
Demonstrate major misconceptions of how pairs of genes may control patterns of inheritance.
Are unable to define species.
Make major errors in explaining that changes in the genes of sex cells may affect offspring.
80
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 8 Content Standard 9.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Evolution-The Process of Biological Change: Students understand that life forms change over time.
· Explain how the variation of organisms within a species and how a great diversity of species increases the chance that some members of a species and/or some living things will survive, even if there are large changes in the environment.
Investigate, using print and electronic resources, how Darwin's observations led to a new view of the origin and diversity of species; summarize his key findings.
Provide a wide range of examples that show how species are adapted to their particular environments and describe the mechanism which gave rise to the adaptations.
Explain, using diagrams and well-chosen examples, that the greater the number of characteristics organisms share, the more closely they are related.
Use fossil evidence to explain how organisms have changed over time, cite major molecular, embryological and structural evidence that substantiate conclusions drawn from fossil studies.
Investigate and provide an estimate of the number of species of animals, plants and microorganisms that are alive today.
Explain differences and similarities between species in terms of biological evolution.
Give multiple examples of how organisms have adaptive characteristics that have allowed them to survive and therefore reproduce.
Explain that all organisms show general similarities of internal structures and chemical processes.
Outline, using drawings, diagrams, charts, etc., major lines of evidence that support evolutionary relationships among species (e.g., fossil record, DNA sequences, any atomical similarities, etc.).
State that millions of species of animals, plants, and microorganisms are alive today, but do not provide supporting detail.
Require assistance to explain differences and similarities between species in terms of biological evolution.
Have difficulty relating the adaptive characteristics of an organism to its ability to survive and therefore reproduce.
Have limited success in identifying similarities among the internal structures and/or functions of different organisms.
Describe, in vague terms, various lines of evidence supporting evolutionary relationships.
· · · ·
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · ·
81
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade: 8 (Standard 9.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · Are unable to articulate the concept that millions of species of animals, plants, and microorganisms are alive today.
Have limited success in explaining differences and similarities between species in terms of biological evolution.
Make little or no connection between an organism's adaptive characteristics and its ability to survive and therefore reproduce.
Make little or no connection between the presence of similar internal structures and chemical processes and the relatedness of different organisms.
Are unable to cite evidence used to establish evolutionary relationships among species.
82
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 8 Content Standard 10.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Earth Structures and Composition: Students understand that the Earth is composed of interrelated systems of rocks, water, air, and life.
· · · Identify mineral samples on the basis of physical properties, and identify rock samples on the basis of obvious physical features.
Develop models to explain the formation of specific local landforms (e.g., volcanic mountains, fault-block mountains, caves, glacial valleys, river valleys).
Accurately differentiate between the internal layers of the Earth using a physical model or a multimedia presentation and/or describe properties of the internal layers of the Earth using materials with similar properties (e.g., use a cornstarch/water model to illustrate the plasticity of the mantle).
Examine soil samples, accurately relate properties of various soil samples to each sample's place of origin, and accurately identify some basic nutrients found in soil samples (e.g., nitrates, phosphates).
Give substantial explanations about how the varying properties of the atmosphere affect human activities (e.g., how the ionosphere affects radio and television communication, how changes in pressure with elevation affect boiling points and aircraft construction, how ozone blocks ultraviolet radiation).
Evaluate critically and discuss the feasibility of predicting and controlling geologic events.
Describe mineral samples on the basis of physical properties (hardness, luster, color, streak, cleavage, and crystal shape) and describe rock samples on the basis of obvious physical features (e.g., sedimentary structures such as ripple marks, metamorphic structures such as foliation, igneous structures such as interlocking crystals).
Explain, using models (e.g., stream tables, clay layers), how erosion, deposition, and pushing and pulling forces inside the Earth create landforms (e.g., mountains, valleys).
Describe, using three-dimensional models or drawings, the internal layers of the Earth (i.e., continental and oceanic crust, a hot, convecting mantle, and a dense, metallic core).
Demonstrate, compare, and contrast the properties of various soil samples (e.g., color, texture, capacity to retain water), and explain, citing observations of actual soil samples, that soil contains materials that are required for things that live in the soil.
List the major components of the atmosphere at the Earth's surface and their relative abundance (i.e., nitrogen is the largest component, followed by oxygen, with other gases like carbon dioxide and water vapor in smaller amounts); describe how the properties (temperature, density, and pressure) and composition of the atmosphere vary with elevation.
Describe causes and effects of geologic events (e.g., earthquakes, landslides, volcanoes, floods).
· ·
· MEETS STANDARD ·
· · ·
·
·
83
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade: 8 (Standard 10.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Make some errors in describing the properties of minerals and/or rock samples.
Attempt to use models to explain how landforms form, but explanations lack clarity.
Omit necessary details when describing the internal layers of the Earth.
Demonstrate some knowledge of soil properties, but ineffectively relate soil's composition to the requirements of things that live in the soil.
Describe the atmosphere, but leave out some significant details; provide unclear comparisons and contrasts of atmospheric structure and properties.
Incompletely and inaccurately describe geologic phenomena.
Have difficulty in describing the properties of minerals and rock samples.
Provide inaccurate descriptions of how landforms form.
Have little success in describing the internal layers of the Earth.
Have little success in describing the properties of soil, and demonstrate little or no understanding of soil's role in supporting life.
Are unable to describe structure or properties of the atmosphere.
Give mostly incomplete and inaccurate descriptions of geologic phenomena.
84
Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 8 Content Standard 11.0
Earth Models: Students understand that the Earth may be represented by a variety of maps and models.
· · · · · · Define locations on the surface of North America using township and range coordinates, and explain the historical origins of that system of land division.
Use a compass and different kinds of maps to follow a route through an area.
Create a color-coded map to compare and contrast various features over an area.
Determine the date and time of day in various places throughout the world (including across the International Date Line), given the local date and time of day.
Define locations on the Earth's surface using degrees of latitude and longitude coordinates.
Compare and contrast the kinds of features found on various kinds of maps (contour, physical, political, geological); find the state of Nevada or Nevada features (depending on map scale) on various kinds of maps (contour, physical, political, geological).
Use a color-coded map to compare and contrast various features (e.g., temperature, population density, geology, precipitation).
Determine the time of day in various places throughout the world (but not across the International Date Line), given the local time of day.
Define inconsistently locations on the Earth's surface using degrees of latitude and longitude coordinates.
Compare and contrast, with limited success, the kinds of features found on various kinds of maps; inconsistently find the state of Nevada or Nevada features on various kinds of maps.
Use a color-coded map to compare and contrast various features, with limited success.
Determine, with some errors, the time of day in various places throughout the world, given the local time of day.
Are unable to define locations on the Earth's surface using degrees of latitude and longitude coordinates.
Compare and contrast, with little success, the kinds of features found on various kinds of maps; have little success finding the state of Nevada or Nevada features on various kinds of maps.
Use a color-coded map to compare and contrast, with little or no success, various features.
Are unable to determine the time of day in various places throughout the world, given the local time of day.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · ·
85
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 8 Content Standard 12.0
Earth History: Students understand that Earth systems (such as weather and mountain formation) may change or vary.
· · · Identify comprehensively and systematically the processes and rates of change that occurred in the formation of a landform.
Construct a model of the geologic time scale which includes details of major geologic events (e.g., mountain building, continental drift) and major life forms of Precambrian time and of the Palezoic, Mesozoic, and Cenozoic eras.
Infer, citing correlations with present-day organisms and geologic processes, a past environment and/or behavior of an extinct organism given details of the organism's features and features of the rock in which its fossil is found.
Identify key processes and rates of change that occurred in the formation of a landform (e.g., slow processes of weathering, erosion, deposition; relatively fast processes of volcanism, mass wasting) Apply, using actual, replica, or graphic reproductions of fossils, the following evidence to show that life forms and environmental conditions change over time: ·the fossil record reflects a pattern of change in organisms over time.
·many fossils are similar to organisms that are alive today, allowing logical comparisons of past and present environments.
·describe reasons that fossil evidence may not form or may be destroyed (e.g., scavenger and decomposer activity, weathering/eroision). ·describe reasons that fossil evidence may not form or may be destroyed (e.g., scavenger and decomposer activity, weathering/eroision).
Provide a reasonable description of how weathering, erosion, deposition, radioactive decay, volcanic activity, plate tectonics, and many other natural processes that occur presently are the same as those that occurred in the past.
Ineffectively identify processes and rates of change that occurred in the formation of a landform.
Ineffectively apply evidence in attempting to show that life forms and environmental conditions change over time; describe reasons, with some inaccuracies, that fossil evidence may not form or may be destroyed.
Provide a partial description of how weathering, erosion, deposition, radioactive decay, volcanic activity, plate tectonics, and many other natural processes that occur presently are the same as those that occurred in the past.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
86
Science Performance Level Descriptors Grade: 12 (Standard 12.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · Identify, with little success, processes and rates of change that occurred in the formation of a landform.
Are unable to use evidence to show that life forms and environmental conditions change over time and/or provide credible reasons that fossil evidence may not form or may be destroyed.
Provide fragmented or inaccurate descriptions of how weathering, erosion, deposition, radioactive decay, volcanic activity, plate tectonics, and many other natural processes that occur presently are the same as those that occurred in the past.
87
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 8 Content Standard 13.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD
Earth and Space Sciences: Students understand that Earth systems have a variety of cycles through which energy and matter continuously flow.
· · · · · · · Demonstrate in writing with appropriate diagrams or charts, a thorough understanding that the sun is the ultimate source of energy for key Earth processes, trace the flow of energy in each process.
Make logical short-term predictions about local and regional weather using first-hand observations or logical long-term predictions about climate, using weather and climate maps.
Explain, using diagrams and citing first-hand observations, how water dissolves minerals and gases as it passes through the water cycle and carries them to oceans and lakes.
Infer the climate throughout a hypothetical region, given information about the region's proximity to large bodies of water, patterns of atmospheric movement, latitudes, and altitudes.
Observe and describe a wide variety of processes that are reversible and others that are practically irreversible.
Explain extensively that Earth is an open system with respect to energy.
Explain extensively how geothermal power is used by humans, and locate some sources of geothermal energy on a map of Nevada.
Explain, using diagrams and words, that the sun is the ultimate source of energy for major Earth processes (e.g., from sun to plant to fossil fuel; from sun to evaporation to precipitation to weathering and erosion due to water).
Explain, citing direct observations of the high specific heat of water (i.e., water's relatively high capacity to absorb heat and release heat slowly), the moderating effect that large bodies of water have on weather and climate; · explain, using weather maps, the weather that occurs near boundaries between air masses.
· describe the formation and types of clouds and how these cloud types are associated with particular patterns of weather (e.g., particular clouds often precede particular kinds of fronts between air masses; cumulonimbus clouds are typically associated with thunderstorms). · explain the relationship between temperature, moisture, and origin of air masses (e.g., air masses that form over land tend to be dry; air masses that form in polar regions tend to be cold). · explain, citing first hand observations (e.g., radiation striking a surface from a light bulb at various angles of incidence), the relationship between changes in the aspect of Earth's axis relative to the sun and the incidence of solar radiation.
· explain, using climate and weather data, diagrams, maps, and models, how long-term patterns of air movement combined with regional topography affect regional climate (e.g., rain-shadow deserts caused by coastal mountain ranges).
Explain, using a model or a diagram, how water circulates through the Earth, oceans and atmosphere through interlinked cycles of evaporation, condensation, transpiration, runoff, and groundwater percolation.
Describe, using climate and weather data, drawings, and maps, how climate is affected by proximity to large bodies of water, patterns of atmospheric movement, latitude, and altitude.
Observe and describe amply some processes that are reversible (e.g., pH indicator changes, stretching a spring within its elastic limit) and others that are practically irreversible (e.g., burning, stretching a spring beyond its elastic limit, extinction of a species) Explain, citing first-hand observations (e.g., the conservation of energy in calorimeter experiments) that the energy the Earth receives over geologic time approximately equals the energy that it loses.
Describe, using diagrams and models, the relationships among geothermal and tectonic processes (i.e., geothermal processes occur near lithosphere plate boundaries, or where lithosphere plates are fractured or relatively thin).
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
· · · · ·
88
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade: 8 (Standard 13.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · · · · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · · · · · · · Demonstrate, using diagrams and words, incomplete understanding that the sun is the ultimate source of energy for many Earth processes.
Attempt to explain, citing direct observations of the high specific heat of water, the moderating effect that large bodies of water have on weather and climate.
Attempt to explain, using weather maps, the weather that occurs near boundaries between air masses.
Attempt to describe the formation and types of clouds and how these cloud types are associated with particular patterns of weather.
Attempt to explain the relationship between temperature, moisture, and origin of air masses.
Attempt to explain, citing first-hand observations, the relationship between changes in the aspect of Earth's axis relative to the sun and the incidence of solar radiation.
Attempt to explain, using climate and weather data, diagrams, maps, and models, how long-term patterns of air movement combined with regional topography affect regional climate.
Attempt to explain, using a model or a diagram, how water circulates through the Earth, oceans and atmosphere through interlinked cycles of evaporation, condensation, transpiration, runoff, and groundwater percolation.
Describe with some inaccuracies, using climate and weather data, drawings, and maps, how climate is affected by proximity to large bodies of water, patterns of atmospheric movement, latitude, and altitude.
Observe and describe, with some errors, some processes that are reversible and others that are practically irreversible Attempt to explain, citing first-hand observations, that the energy the Earth receives over geologic time approximately equals the energy that it loses.
Describe, with some inaccuracies, using diagrams and models, the relationships among geothermal and tectonic processes .
Explain, with little success, that the sun is the ultimate source of energy for many Earth processes.
Explain, with little success, the moderating effect that large bodies of water have on weather and climate.
Explain, with little success, the weather that occurs near boundaries between air masses.
Describe, with little success, the formation and types of clouds and how these cloud types are associated with particular patterns of weather.
Explain, with little success, the relationship between temperature, moisture, and origin of air masses.
Explain, with little success, the relationship between changes in the aspect of Earth's axis relative to the sun and the incidence of solar radiation.
Explain, with little success, using climate and weather data, diagrams, maps, and models, how longterm patterns of air movement combined with regional topography affect regional climate.
Explain, with little success, how water circulates through the Earth, oceans and atmosphere.
Describe with major inaccuracies, how climate is affected by proximity to large bodies of water, patterns of atmospheric movement, latitude, and altitude.
Observe and describe insufficiently some processes that are reversible and others that are practically irreversible Explain, with little success, that the energy the Earth receives over geologic time approximately equals the energy that it loses.
Describe, with major inaccuracies, the relationships among geothermal and tectonic processes .
89
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Science Grade 8 Content Standard 14.0 EXCEEDS STANDARDS
Earth and Science Descriptors: Students understand that the Earth is part of a planetary system within the Milky Way galaxy, which is part of the known universe.
· · · · · Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe in detail, using drawings or models, the size, mass, composition, atmosphere, water content, temperature, and surface features of the planets in our solar system.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and demonstrate convincingly, with drawings or models, how seasons, eclipses, moon phases, and tides are caused by the effects of relative motion and positions of the sun, Earth, and moon.
Describe the Big Bang Theory of the origin of the universe and cite supporting evidence.
Explain, using diagrams or multimedia software, how radio and optical telescopes function.
Make predictions, using diagrams or software simulations, of planetary motion and interactions by qualitatively applying the laws of Kepler and the universal law of gravitation.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe, using drawings or models, principle characteristics such as size, mass composition (i.e., gas, ice, rock), and surface features (e.g., volcanic and erosional features, coloration) of the planets in our solar system.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe, using drawings or models, how seasons, eclipses, moon phases, and tides are caused by the effects of relative motion and positions of the sun, Earth, and moon.
Explain that billions of galaxies form most of the visible mass in the universe; compare the chemical composition of galaxies to that of planet Earth.
Explain how various tools (e.g., optical and radio telescopes, unmanned robotic spacecraft), allow us to investigate objects in the sky that are too distant, faint, or bright to observe directly from Earth.
Describe the historical development of some of the laws of motion (e.g., the laws of Kepler and Newton) that apply to the motion of objects in the solar system.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe, with some errors, using drawings or models, the size, mass, composition, and surface features of the planets in our solar system.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe, with some errors, using drawings or models, how seasons, eclipses, moon phases, and tides are caused by the effects of relative motion and positions of the sun, Earth, and moon.
Attribute most of the visible mass in the universe to galaxies.
Attempt to explain how various tools allow us to investigate objects in the sky that are too distant, faint, or bright to observe directly from Earth, but are confused about the way the tools work and/or the information they provide.
Describe, with some errors, the historical development of some of the laws of motion that apply to the motion of objects in the solar system.
MEETS STANDARD
·
· · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · ·
90
Science Performance Level Descriptors Grade: 8 (Standard 14.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · Investigate, but make poor use of resources, and describe, with major errors, the size, mass, composition, and surface features of the planets in our solar system.
Investigate, with minimum use of resources, and describe, with major errors, how seasons, eclipses, moon phases, and tides are caused by the effects of relative motion and positions of the sun, Earth, and moon.
Are unable to describe that billions of galaxies form the visible mass in the universe.
Are unable to explain how various tools allow us to investigate objects in the sky from Earth.
Describe, with major errors, the historical development of some of the laws of motion that apply to the motion of objects in the solar system.
91
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 8 Content Standard 15.0 Ecosystems: Students will demonstrate an understanding that ecosystems display patterns of organization, change, and stability as a result of the interactions and interdependencies among the life forms and the physical components of the Earth.
· Develop a presentation to represent visually and explain how organisms interact with the living and non-living components of their ecosystems; include food chains and food webs; predict how a change in an organism (e.g., population of rabbits), and a change in a non-living component (e.g., nitrate run-off from fertilizer in a stream bordering farmland), will affect other organisms in the ecosystem.
Analyze an ecosytyem, with explanation of the role that selected organisms perform in their ecosystem; show that some relationships may be competitive or mutually beneficial.
Compare and contrast photosynthetic and chemosynthetic energy bases for ecosystems; cite specific examples.
Compare and contrast in a wide variety of geographically distinct ecosystems.
Develop a presentation to represent visually and explain how organisms interact with the living and non-living components of their ecosystems; include food chains and food webs.
Characterize organisms in a variety of ecosystems by their function (i.e., producer, consumer, predator, prey, parasite, host, scavenger, decomposer).
Analyze the role of predators as a stabilizing factor in an ecosystem, explaining how they can prevent habitat destruction or species extinction, citing specific examples.
Trace the flow of energy in an ecosystem, noting the dissipation of heat at each energy transfer point and describe the impact on the ecosystem (e.g., compare the resource implications of a vegetarian diet to one with high meat consumption).
Identify similarities and differences found in geographically distinct ecosystems.
Develop a presentation to represent visually how organisms interact with the living and non-living components of their ecosystem with some knowledge, but explanation lacks detail.
Explain partially the role that selected organisms perform in their ecosystem.
Trace simplistically the energy flow in ecosystems from sunlight into chemical energy by producers.
Identify, with some assistance, similarities and differences found in geographically distinct ecosystems.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· · · MEETS STANDARD · ·
·
· APPROACHES STANDARD · · · ·
92
Science Performance Level Descriptors Grade: 8 (Standard 15.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · Develop a presentation to represent visually and explain how organisms interact with the living and non-living components of their ecosystem, but presentation is confusing and explanation lacks essential detail.
Provide explanation that lacks connection to the role that selected organisms perform in their ecosystem.
Demonstrate serious misconceptions in tracing the energy flow in ecosystems from sunlight into chemical energy by producers.
Identify, with little success, similarities and differences found in geographically distinct ecosystems.
93
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 8 Content Standard 16.0
Natural Resources: Students demonstrate and understand that natural resources include renewable and non-renewable materials and energy.
All organisms, including human, use resources to maintain and improve their existence, and the use of resources can have positive and negative consequences.
· · · · · Analyze and describe the costs and benefits of renewable and non-renewable resources.
Analyze and describe the relationships between the cost of natural resources and their abundance and/or accessible location .
Investigate, using print, multimedia, and/or Internet resources, and describe the location, distribution, and estimated reserves of non-renewable energy resources; describe strategies for managing these, including risks, benefits, and trade-offs for each.
Analyze and describe how organisms impact their local environment through their use of natural resources; cite specific examples.
Analyze and describe the impacts of using various technologies on the local or global environment.
Observe and describe the identifying characteristics of renewable and non-renewable resources.
Explain how some natural resources are limited in their abundance and/or accessible location (e.g., water in the desert).
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe the location and distribution of non-renewable energy resources.
Observe directly and use print, multimedia, and Internet resources to describe how organisms alter their local environment through their use of natural resources.
Describe how unintended consequences of technology can cause resource depletion (e.g., internal combustion engines burn fossil fuels which are non-renewable) and environmental degradation.
(e.g., internal combustion engines cause air pollution); describe how technology can increase resource availability (e.g., internal combustion engines allow us to harvest and transport resources more efficiently), can mitigate environmental degradation (e.g., improvements in internal combustion engines design and their fuels lower rates of air pollution), and can make new resources economical (e.g., improvements in mining technology make it financially feasible to mine ores previously considered too low-grade to be profitable).
Describe, with some errors, the identifying characteristics of renewable and nonrenewable resources.
Describe, with some confusion, how some natural resources are limited in their abundance and/or accessible location.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe, with some errors, the location and distribution of non-renewable energy resources.
Observe directly and use print, multimedia, and Internet resources, but do not clearly describe how organisms alter their local environment through their use of natural resources.
Are unable to distinguish between how unintended consequences of technology can cause resource depletion or environmental degradation, and conversely how technology can increase resource availability, making new resources economical, and can mitigate environmental degradation.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · ·
94
Science Performance Level Descriptors Grade: 8 (Standard 16.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · Describe with major errors or significant omissions, the identifying characteristics of renewable and non-renewable resources.
Describe how some natural resources are limited in their abundance, but have difficulty in explaining the effect of accessibility on abundance.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe with major errors the location and distribution of non-renewable energy resources.
Are unable to identify how organisms alter their local environment through their use of natural resources.
Are not able to provide a coherent description of the positive and negative effects of technology on the environment.
95
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 8 Content Standard 18.0 Scientific, Historical, and Technological Perspectives: Students understand that humans have the unique ability to change personal and societal behavior based on ethical considerations regarding other organisms, the planet as a whole, and future generations.
(Nature of Science, Attributes of Scientific Research, The History of Science and Invention, Technology, The Dynamic Character of Scientific Knowledge, Scientific Ethics) · Demonstrate that scientific investigations involve the following principles and apply them routinely: · use of logic; · respecting rules of evidence; · follow the standards for keeping a science notebook; · openness to criticism; · public reporting of methods and procedures.
Carry out three different types of authentic scientific investigations successfully Research information and produce information with graphics that explains that ancient peoples provided knowledge about the natural world that is still regarded as valid today, even though that knowledge may not have originated by scientific methods.
Conduct investigations both alone and in teams; compare and contrast their results with the results of peers and account for discrepancies.
Compare and contrast essential features of scientific inquiry and technological design, using multiple and related examples of research and the application of the research in technology.
Review results and revise techniques and processes, redesigning their experiment accordingly.
Identify and describe, with examples, how science is subject to strengths and limitations as are other human social and intellectual activities.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· ·
· · · ·
96
Science Performance Level Descriptors Grade: 8 (Standard 18.0 continued) MEETS STANDARD · Demonstrate that scientific investigations involve: · use of logic (e.g., scientific investigation using step-by-step thinking); · respecting rules of evidence (e.g., generally use truthful, careful, and accurate collection of evidence and information in a scientific investigation); · follow the standards for keeping a science notebook; · openness to criticism (e.g., respectfully consider constructive criticism and peer review; respectfully offer constructive criticism and peer review); · public reporting of methods and procedures (e.g., peer review).
· Successfully Carry out at least one of the following kinds of investigations successfully (i.e., a controlled experiment, a field study and a multiple-source research report).
· Explain, using examples, that ancient peoples provided knowledge about the natural world that is still regarded as valid today, even though that knowledge may not have originated by scientific methods · Adequately model that scientists may work in teams and some may work alone, but all communicate extensively with each other.
(e.g., by doing investigations and sharing results with others doing similar work, students benefit by learning through communication).
· Compare and contrast scientific inquiry and technological design using multiple and related examples of research and the application of the research in technology (e.g., fish ladders, habitats and walkways for tortoises, handicap access, and pace makers).
· Critique results, techniques, and processes used in a scientific investigation.
· Compare and contrast the strengths and limitations of science as related to other human social and intellectual activities.
· Demonstrate some of the following principles in carrying out investigations: · use of logic; · respecting rules of evidence · follow the standards for keeping a science notebook; · openness to criticism; · public reporting of methods and procedures.
Attempt to carry out one kind of scientific investigation but have difficulty with one or more aspects.
Describe an example where ancient peoples provided knowledge about the natural world that is still regarded as valid today, even though that knowledge may not have originated by scientific methods.
Conduct investigations as part of a team and share the results.
Can identify some important features that distinguish scientific inquiry and technological design.
Can identify the need to revise results, techniques, and processes used in a scientific investigation, but are unable to do so.
Identify and describe how science is subject to strengths and limitations as are other human social and intellectual activities.
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · ·
97
Science Performance Level Descriptors Grade: 8 (Standard 18.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · Can identify the following principles as being essential to scientific investigations: · use of logic; · respecting rules of evidence · follow the standards for keeping a science notebook; · openness to criticism; · public reporting of methods and procedures.
Are unable to carry out a scientific investigation to completion.
Do not demonstrate that ancient peoples provided knowledge about the natural world that is still regarded as valid today, even though that knowledge may not have originated by scientific methods.
Explain that scientists communicate with each other but can not model the process.
Superficially describe that scientific inquiry and technological design have similarities and differences.
Can be prompted to review results, techniques, and processes used in a scientific investigation, but will not do so on their own.
Has little success in identifying and describing how science is subject to strengths and limitations related to other human social and intellectual activities.
· · · · · ·
98
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 8 Content Standard 19.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Reasoning and Critical Response Skills: Students understand that many decisions require critical consideration of scientific evidence.
· · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · · Critique the use of statistics, data and graphs in a variety of scientific work.
Produce a thoughtful, quantitative analysis of controversial human activities with their associated benefits, costs and risks.
Analyze and clearly describe a simple system in terms of its simple efficiency, optimal function, and possible sources of malfunction.
Use diagrams to predict the results if one or more components are changed.
Accurately evaluate information to distinguish among scientific evidence, bias and opinion when problem solving.
Identify and evaluate the use of statistics, data and graphs in a variety of scientific work.
Give examples of human activities with their associated benefits, costs and risks (e.g., cloning, electric automobiles, and pest control).
Analyze and describe a simple system (e.g., pendulum, aquarium, toilet) in terms of its efficiency, optimal function, and possible sources of malfunction.
Evaluate information to distinguish between fact and opinion when problem solving (e.g., product advertising, early theories concerning flat earth vs. round earth).
Identify but incorrectly evaluate the use of statistics, data and graphs in a variety of scientific work.
Give examples of controversial human activities, but incorrectly assess their associated benefits, costs and risks.
Analyze and describe, with significant errors, a system in terms of efficiency, optimal function, and possible sources of malfunction.
Ineffectively evaluates information to distinguish between fact and opinion when problem solving.
Have difficulty in recognizing scientific evidence, bias and opinion.
Do not make appropriate use of statistics, data and graphs in a variety of scientific work.
Give examples of controversial human activities, but cannot assess their associated benefits, costs and risks.
Cannot describe a system in conceptual terms.
Confuse fact and opinion; state that every opinion is equally valid.
99
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 8 Content Standard 20.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · Systems, Models, Risk and Predictions: Students understand that a variety of models can be used to describe or predict things and events.
Investigate, describe, and use two or more models to explain related events.
Make changes to a model and note the effects and predict what would happen if similar changes were made to the real situation; evaluate the model's usefulness (e.g., conduct tests with the use of models on the effect of erosion on various landforms).
Explain and illustrate natural cycles within systems.
Analyze data from two groups and calculate and compare their means, medians, modes, and ranges; explain the significance of these statistics.
Develop a generalized approach for analyzing the risks and benefits of any situation (e.g., walking to school, having trains pass through your community, driving a car).
Use two different models to demonstrate the same thing (e.g., a map and a globe).
Use models to predict change (e.g., a stream table).
Identify and illustrate natural cycles within systems (e.g., water, planetary motion, climate, geological changes).
Analyze data from two groups, comparing their means, medians, modes and ranges, and explain why these statistics are important.
Use a systematic approach to describe the risks and benefits of a situation.
Describe how two different models can be used to demonstrate the same thing but confuse the models or fail to identify and relate key features of the models to the event.
Can manipulate a model, but experience difficulty in making reasonable predictions.
Identify and illustrate natural cycles within systems with some errors.
Analyze data from two groups, incompletely or inaccurately.
Can describe the risks and benefits of a given situation.
Identify some key features of related models, but are unable to apply them.
Do not identify the key features in a model which can be used to predict change in real world situations.
Identify natural cycles within systems.
Cannot analyze and compare data from two groups.
Are unable to describe the risks and benefits of a situation.
· · ·
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · · · ·
100
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 8 Content Standard 21.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · Scientific Values and Attitudes: Students understand that science is an active process of systematically examining the natural world.
Explain fully why it is critical to keep honest, clear and accurate records and do so.
Explain that hypotheses are valuable, even if they turn out to be incorrect, if they lead to fruitful investigations and can give examples drawn from the history of science.
Compare varying explanations given for a particular phenomena, event, or result and explain why it is not always possible to decide which, if any, is correct.
Clearly state reasons for keeping honest, clear, and accurate records (e.g., maintaining integrity of the scientific process; mitigation of injury to persons, property, or the environment).
Explain that hypotheses are valuable even if they turn out to be incorrect.
Compare varying explanations given for a particular phenomena, event, or result.
Are unclear about the importance of keeping honest, clear, and accurate records and their record keeping is uneven.
Have trouble understanding that hypotheses are valuable, even if they turn out to be incorrect, if they lead to fruitful investigations.
Occasionally misinterpret explanations given for a particular phenomena, event, or result.
Do not grasp the importance of keeping honest, clear, and accurate records.
Do not understand that hypotheses are valuable, even if they turn out to be incorrect, if they lead to fruitful investigations.
Are unable to compare varying explanations given for a particular phenomena, event, or result.
101
Science Performance Level Descriptors Communication Skills Grade 8 Content Standard 22.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · Communication Skills: Students understand that a variety of communication methods can be used to share scientific information.
Write clear, detailed, step-by-step instructions for a complex procedure using flow charts as appropriate.
Organize information in tables and graphs in such a way that relationships are readily apparent; describe these relationships including essential but not extraneous detail.
Convincingly discuss scientific topics by paraphrasing, asking for clarification or elaboration, and expressing alternative positions using print, Internet and multi media resources.
Write clear, step-by-step instructions for a procedure.
Organize information in tables and graphs and describe the relationships they reveal.
Discuss scientific topics by paraphrasing, asking for clarification or elaboration, and expressing alternative positions using print, Internet and multi media resources.
Write confusing step-by-step instructions for a procedure.
Organize information in tables and graphs in a way that tends to obscure rather than reveal relationships; describe existing relationships in a confusing manner.
Discuss scientific topics superficially.
Attempt to write step-by-step instructions for a procedure but omit critical steps or sequence steps incorrectly.
Cannot organize information in tables and graphs and describe the existing relationships without strong teacher support.
Have difficulty discussing scientific topics due to inaccurate paraphrasing, reluctance to ask for clarification or elaboration, and inability to express alternative positions.
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · ·
102
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 8 Content Standard 23.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · Scientific Applications of Mathematics: Students understand that scientific inquiry is enhanced and often communicated by using mathematics.
Explain that two quantities can be directly proportional to one another (i.e., one quantity increases as the other increases) or inversely proportional to one another, (i.e., one quantity increases as the other decreases); provide multiple examples of each kind of relationship; calculate answers to problems by substituting numerical values in algebraic equations based on simple direct or inverse relationships (i.e., a=bc) or a = b/c).
Explain, clearly and concisely, the steps required to arrive at a solution to a given problem and the purpose of each step.
Explain, that probabilities are ratios and can be expressed as fractions, percentages, or odds; estimate probabilities of outcomes in scientific investigations on the basis of prior trials or the number of possible outcomes.
Use the "input units" (e.g., seconds, square inches, miles per hour) to determine the proper unit for expressing the answer; convert compound units in scientific expressions (e.g., miles per hour into feet per second).
Explain the differences between precision and accuracy, using examples; decide what precision is adequate and round off the result of calculator operations to enough significant figures to reflect those of the inputs.
Synthesize data from related investigations carried out under similar conditions and use these to predict the outcome of an analogous investigation.
Explain that quantities can vary in proportion to one another; provide examples (e.g., the mass of a substance is directly proportional to its volume; the time it takes a vehicle to travel is directly proportional to the distance traveled).
Can generally explain the steps required to solve a given problem and why they are necessary.
Explain, using examples, that probabilities are ratios and can be expressed as fractions, percentages, or odds; make reasonable estimates of outcomes in familiar situations (e.g., probability of being born a boy or girl, struck by lightening, involved in an automobile accident).
Explain that, with very few exceptions, numbers in science are expressed with units; consistently select and use the appropriate SI unit for a particular measurement (e.g., meters for length, seconds for time, kilograms for mass).
Define accuracy and precision; decide if repeated measurements and computations of quantities are reasonably precise and accurate and explain why.
Make reasonable predictions on the basis of all known data from related studies carried out under similar conditions.
· · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · ·
· · ·
103
Science Performance Level Descriptors Grade: 8 (Standard 23.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · BELOW
Describe the concept of direct proportionality in vague terms or do not provide appropriate examples.
Have difficulty explaining the steps required to solve problems and why they are necessary.
Have difficulty explaining that probabilities are ratios and interpreting them as fractions, percentages, or odds; make unreasonable estimates of outcomes in familiar situations.
Inconsistently estimate probabilities of outcomes in familiar situations.
Do not clearly differentiate precision and accuracy and have difficulty applying these concepts to measurements and calculations.
Have difficulty synthesizing and applying data from related data investigations to predict the outcome of a new, analogous situation.
Are unable to describe the concept of direct proportionality and provide examples.
Given a completed calculation, are unable to explain the purpose of each step.
Are unable to explain the meaning of probabilities or apply the concept to familiar situations.
Have limited success estimating probabilities of outcomes in familiar situations.
Frequently select and use an inappropriate SI unit for a particular measurement.
Are unable to differentiate and/or apply the concepts of precision and accuracy.
Are unable to make reasonable predictions even when presented with data from similar investigations.
STANDARD
· · · · · · ·
104
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 8 Content Standard 24.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Laboratory Skills and Safety: Students can appropriately and safely apply the tools and techniques of scientific inquiry.
· · · · · Consistently use instruments and laboratory safety equipment properly and assist others to do so.
Consistently handle and dispose of chemicals according to established standards, and anticipate potential hazards.
Choose appropriate materials for making or repairing simple mechanical constructions and use the materials in an innovative, effective way.
Keep accurate, organized records of scientific investigations that can be readily followed by others.
Use appropriate technology in laboratory procedures for measuring, recording, storing, and analyzing data effectively and efficiently.
Design and independently carry out a controlled experiment.
Consistently use instruments and laboratory safety equipment properly.
Consistently handle and dispose of chemicals according to established standards.
Choose appropriate, available materials for making or repairing simple mechanical constructions (e.g., designing an apparatus using simple machines).
Keep accurate, organized records of scientific investigations.
Use appropriate technology in laboratory procedures for measuring, recording, storing, and analyzing data (e.g., computers, graphing calculators, probes).
Design and carry out a controlled experiment working in a small group.
Use instruments and laboratory safety equipment properly, when prompted.
Require constant reminders to adhere to established standards while handling and disposing of chemicals.
Make inappropriate choices of materials for making or repairing simple mechanical constructions, due to insufficient knowledge of the material's properties and/or the nature of the task.
Keep records that may be inaccurate and are organized in a way that makes them difficult to follow.
Sometimes fail to match the technology to the task and/or use the technology correctly.
Can explain what is meant by a controlled experiment but can design one only with considerable teacher support.
Do not know how or fail to use instruments and laboratory safety equipment properly.
Require constant supervision in order to prevent injury to self or others while handling and disposing of chemicals.
Have considerable difficulty in choosing appropriate, available materials for making or repairing simple mechanical constructions.
Keep records of scientific investigations that are frequently inaccurate and slipshod.
Use technology inappropriately and incorrectly in laboratory procedures for measuring, recording, and analyzing data.
Have little success in explaining and designing a controlled experiment.
· MEETS STANDARD · · · · ·
· APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · ·
· BELOW STANDARD · · · · · ·
105
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 12 Content Standard 1.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Forces and Motion: Students understand that forces such as gravitational, electrical, and magnetic influence the motion of objects.
· · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · Use the Laws of Motion to correctly predict the motion of an object and design a workable model to explain or demonstrate the Laws of Motion (e.g., catapult, mousetrap car, bottle rocket).
Explain the role of gravity in such phenomena as tides, planetary orbits, apparent weightlessness in space, and comet orbits.
Accurately calculate the motion of falling objects.
Correctly predict and demonstrate which simple machine would be most efficient in a given situation.
Calculate force, pressure, and area in a wide variety of given situations (P = F/A) and use this relationship to explain phenomena, such as the behavior of gases and water pressure.
Design a functional electromagnetic system given certain specifications (e.g., electric motor, electric circuit, radio transmitter).
Use the Laws of Motion to correctly predict the motion of an object.
Describe changes in the force of gravity based on different masses and distances.
Apply the principle of gravity to the motion of falling objects (e.g., objects accelerate as they fall).
Determine the mechanical advantage and efficiency of various simple machines, (i.e., screw, lever, pulley, wheel, axle, and wedge) and evaluate the usefulness of various machines according to their function, efficiency, and mechanical advantage.
Explain and apply the relationship between force, pressure, and area (P = F/A) to common phenomena (e.g., the gas pressure change in an expanding container or the pressure differences between sharp and dull objects); investigate and describe the relationship between pressure and depth in a liquid.
Describe or explain the relationship between electromagnetic forces and electromagnetic systems (e.g., generators, circuits, electric motors).
Calculate variables for simple electromagnetic systems (i.e., current, resistance, wattage, voltage).
Investigate and describe that the electromagnetic spectrum (including radio waves, light, infrared, etc.) is a form of energy consisting of both electrical and magnetic energy.
·
·
106
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 12 (Standard 1.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · State the Laws of Motion, but, are unable to consistently apply them.
Are able to explain that the force of attraction between two objects is proportional to the product of the masses and inversely proportional to the square of the distance between them, but have difficulty calculating resulting forces.
Explain mechanical advantage and efficiency and how they pertain to various simple machines, but cannot apply them and arrive at numerical solutions to problems.
Explain the relationship between force, pressure, and area (P = F/A) but cannot apply it.
Explain how electric motors and generators illustrate the relationship between electricity and magnetism but have difficulty calculating variables for simple electromagnetic systems.
Cannot state or apply the Laws of Motion.
State that a force of attraction exists between objects, but are unable to apply the relationship to solve simple problems between the force, mass, and distance.
Cannot explain mechanical advantage and efficiency and how they apply to various simple machines even with assistance.
Cannot explain the relationship between force, pressure, and area (P = F/A).
Cannot explain the relationship between electricity and magnetism and how it applies to generators, circuits, electric motors; cannot calculate variables for simple electromagnetic systems.
· · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · · · ·
107
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 12 Content Standard 2.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · Structure and Properties of Matter: Students understand that materials have distinct properties which depend on the amount of matter present, its chemical composition, and structure.
Investigate and describe two intrinsic properties (i.e., density and solubility); quantitatively define density and molar, molal and normal solutions; manipulate the respective algebraic relationships to solve problems; calculate new concentrations of diluted solutions.
Identify different substances and concentrations based on their characteristic absorption and/or emission spectra and explain the theoretical basis for the techniques.
Discuss the theoretical foundation behind chemical bonding using concepts such as electronegativity.
Predict the type of bond (i.e., polar covalent, nonpolar covalent, ionic, metallic) that will form between given atoms.
Relate bond type to macroscopic properties.
Summarize the major features of the quantum mechanical model of atomic structure and the evidence supporting it; identify quantum numbers, sublevels, and orbitals; write the electronic configuration for neutral atoms with atomic numbers 1-20 and relate it to their reactivity; interpret Columb's Law quantitatively and relate the attraction of a nucleus for its electrons to properties such as ionization energy and electronegativity.
Construct a model or diagram and use the Kinetic Molecular Theory and forces of attraction (e.g., hydrogen bonding, Van der Waal's forces) between particles to explain the phases of matter and their properties.
Construct models or diagrams to depict various carbon based molecules including simple organic structures for alkanes, alkenes, alkynes, aromatic hydrocarbons (benzene), alcohols, carboxylic acids, and amino acids.
Investigate and describe intrinsic (e.g., color, odor, density) and extrinsic (e.g., mass, volume) physical properties of matter.
Apply techniques of spectral analysis (e.g., flame tests, colorimetry, etc, to the identification of elements and compounds.
Distinguish among and describe various types of chemical bonds (e.g., covalent, ionic, and metallic).
Describe the major features of the quantum-mechanical model of atomic structure including the concepts of the probable locations of electrons, discreet energy levels, quantum numbers, and electron configurations.
Apply the Kinetic Molecular Theory and the concept of forces between particles to explain phase changes and the properties of the states of matter.
Explain how carbon atoms uniquely bond to one another to form a large variety of molecules as well as those necessary for life.
· ·
·
· ·
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · · ·
108
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · ·
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 12 (Standard 2.0 continued) Describe the difference between intrinsic and extrinsic properties, with examples, but cannot work simple problems involving density or molarity.
Make substantive errors when using techniques of spectral analysis to identify elements and compounds and colorimetric methods to determine the concentrations of analytes in a solution.
Are unable to distinguish accurately among and describe various types of chemical bonds.
List some essential features of the quantum-mechanical model of atomic structure but are unable to relate these to the behavior of elements; cannot explain why the nucleus of an atom and its electron(s) stay together.
Describe some of the essential features of the Kinetic Molecular Theory and the concept of forces between particles but have difficulty in relating these to the properties of the phases of matter.
Are unable to completely explain how carbon atoms can bond to one another to form a large variety of molecules including those necessary for life.
Are unable to identify properties as extrinsic or intrinsic and are unable to describe solutions in terms of molarity, molality, normality.
Are unable to use techniques of spectral analysis and colorimetric methods.
Are unable to identify or list various bond types.
Are unable to describe the currently accepted model of the atom.
Are unable to describe the essential features of Kinetic Molecular Theory.
Are unable to describe how carbon atoms combine.
BELOW STANDARD
· · · · · ·
109
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 12 Content Standard 3.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · · · · Energy and Matter: Interactions and Forms: Students understand that changes in temperature and pressure can alter states of matter.
Energy exists in many forms, and one form can change into another.
Calculate the loss of energy, as energy is transformed or transferred, for a specific system and the resulting effect.
Interpret phase diagrams to identify physical state.
Calculate various wave characteristics and properties of wave travel (i.e., velocity, angle of reflection, superposition).
Analyze and calculate current, voltage, and resistance in various electrical circuits (i.e., parallel, series, and combination).
Calculate the mass or energy required to transform one into the other (E=mc2 ); relate (E=mc2 ) to nuclear fission.
Demonstrate with a simple model, such as a checker game, the concept of increasing entropy; apply the concept to chemical and physical changes and show it can be countered by changes in heat (entropy).
Explain, using multiple examples, that any energy transfer or transformation results in some "loss" of energy in the form of heat which may spread by radiation, conduction, or convection.
Investigate, using first hand observations, and explain that pressure may affect changes of state.
Investigate, using first hand observations, and describe how waves can superimpose on one another, bend around corners, reflect off surfaces, be absorbed by materials they enter, and change directions when entering a new material.
Investigate, using first hand observations, and describe the properties of electrical circuits in terms of moving electrons, conductivity, resistance, and electrical potential energy.
Investigate, using first hand observations, (e.g., data on conservation of momentum, predictions of projectile motion, careful measurements and calculations of transfer between potential and kinetic energy) how matter and energy may be changed and energy can be transferred in many ways; describe the conservation of mass-energy as it applies to a closed system (E=mc2 ).
Describe the concept of entropy as it applies to a closed system, identifying the tendency for disorder to increase; given examples of chemical and physical changes, state which is favored by entropy.
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
· ·
·
110
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · ·
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 12 (Standard 3.0 continued) State that any energy transfer or transformation results in some "loss" of energy in the form of heat which may spread by radiation, conduction, or convection, but are unable to give appropriate examples.
Are unable to describe that pressure may affect changes of state and/or that changes in pressure affect solids, liquids, and gases differently.
Are unable to correctly describe the basic characteristics of waves and wave motion.
Are unable to correctly characterize simple electrical circuits in terms of current, resistance, and voltage.
Are unable to correctly describe the conservation of mass-energy as it applies to a closed system.
Are unable to describe the concept entropy and/or provide an appropriate example.
Cannot explain or predict that some energy will be "lost" in any transfer or transformation.
Are unable to identify a relationship between pressure and change of state and/or the effects of pressure on solids, liquids, and gases.
Are unable to identify basic characteristics of waves.
Are unable to identify components of an electrical circuit.
Are unable to identify any relationship between mass and energy.
Are unable to define entropy.
BELOW STANDARD
· · · · · ·
111
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 12 Content Standard 4.0
Chemical Reaction: Students understand that chemical reactions change substances into different substances.
· · Given reactants in a chemical change, predict likely products and write a balanced equation; use the information a balanced equation conveys to solve various Stoichiometric problems.
Quantitatively describe the way in which various factors affect the rate of a chemical reaction (i.e., temperature, particle size, pressure, presence of a catalyst, pH, concentration of reactants); relate the effects to what is taking place at the molecular level.
Describe the energy involved in a chemical reaction using the concepts of heats of reaction, heats of formation and entropy.
Describe the types of bonds that an atom may form as a result of its electron configuration (e.g., use hybrid orbital to describe various carbon bonds) and the shapes of the resulting molecules.
Write a balanced equation to describe a given chemical reaction and describe the information it conveys.
Qualitatively describe the way in which various factors affect the rate of a chemical reaction (i.e., temperature, particle size, pressure, presence of a catalyst, pH, concentration of reactants).
Distinguish between endothermic and exothermic reactions (i.e., redox reactions, burning fuel, photosynthesis, respiration, electrochemical reactions in batteries).
Relate the chemical reactivity of an element to its electron configuration; illustrate with appropriate diagrams and examples.
With assistance, write a balanced equation to describe a given chemical reaction.
Describe incompletely or somewhat inaccurately the way in which various factors, which affect it.
Inconsistently relate the release or consumption of energy to chemical reactions.
Inconsistently relate the chemical reactivity of an element to its electron configuration.
Are unable to balance a chemical equation.
Are unable to identify a relationship between reaction rate and factors such as temperature, particle size, pressure, presence of a catalyst, pH, and concentration of reactants.
Are unable to identify a relationship between energy release or consumption and chemical reactions.
Are unable to identify any relationship between chemical properties and electron configuration.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· ·
MEETS STANDARD
· · · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · · ·
112
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade 12 Content Standard 5.0 Nuclear Energy and Electromagnetic Energy: Students understand that nuclear energy and electromagnetic energy are produced from both natural and human-made sources in many forms.
· · Calculate focal points, size of objects, and location of objects.
Write nuclear equations for the radioactive decay of specified isotopes given their mode of decay (i.e., alpha, beta, and gamma emission); calculate the age of a material, its half-life, or the amount of material remaining after a specified time period.
Describe key political, economic, scientific and environmental aspects of nuclear waste disposal.
Draw the electromagnetic spectrum on a logarithmic scale, labeling principle regions.
Calculate mass defect and explain typical origins of radiation in each region.
Research and make a case for or against peacetime uses of nuclear energy.
Use lenses to demonstrate the interaction of light with matter (e.g., reflection, refraction); diagram converging and diverging lenses and describe major applications.
Estimate the age of some materials using predictable rates of nuclear reaction (i.e., half-lives).
Describe the differences in disposal techniques that are required for high-and low-level nuclear wastes.
Describe electromagnetic spectrum labeling principle regions (e.g., gamma rays, x-rays, visible light, UV, IR, radio waves).
Communicate that the strong nuclear force that holds the nucleus together is greater than the weak forces that would tend to break it apart.
Describe the release of energy during the nuclear processes of fission and fusion and give examples of elements that undergo fission and fusion respectively; compare the amount of energy in fission and fusion with that in chemical and phase changes.
Can use lenses to demonstrate with some inaccuracies the interaction of light with matter but are unable to distinguish between converging and diverging lenses.
Explain the concept of half-life and estimate, with occasional mistakes, the age of materials.
Inadequately distinguish between disposal techniques for high- and low-level nuclear waste.
Unable to partially describe the electromagnetic spectrum.
Unable to clearly describe the interaction of forces within the nucleus.
Have difficulty differentiating clearly between fission and fusion or describing the magnitude of the energy released.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · ·
113
BELOW STANDARD
· · · · · ·
Science Performance Level Descriptors Physical Science Grade: 12 (Standard 5.0 continued) Are unable to demonstrate the interaction of light with matter using lenses.
Are unable to explain half-life or use it to estimate the age of material.
Are unable to identify the difference between high- and low-level nuclear waste.
Are unable to describe the electromagnetic spectrum.
Are unable to distinguish between different forces within the atom.
Are unable to describe fission and fusion accurately.
114
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 12 Content Standard 6.0 Structure and Function: Students understand that all life forms, at all levels of organization, use specialized structures and similar process to meet life's needs.
· · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · Correctly explain the concept of equilibrium in organisms as related to disease processes and can provide accurate examples of specific disruptions (e.g., fever inflammation processes).
Accurately distinguish among the systems of the human body and describe the different cells of each (e.g., skeletal, nervous, digestion, etc.).
Independently and accurately trace digestion, absorption, and use of a food or group of foods, through an organism, and can provide specific examples.
Accurately describe photosynthesis and provide supporting diagrams, models or illustrations.
Explain the concept of equilibrium in organisms as related to disease processes with minor errors.
Distinguish among the systems of the human body (e.g., skeletal, nervous, digestive, etc.), and can describe the different cells of each with minimal assistance.
Trace with assistance the digestion, absorbtion, and use of a food or group of foods through an organism.
Reasonably explain the process of photosynthesis.
Demonstrate some general understanding of equilibrium in living systems but are not clear on the connections with disease processes.
Can trace the digestion, absorbtion, and use of a food through an organism, with significant assistance, and explanation lacks detail.
Provide a description of photosynthesis that lacks necessary details.
Demonstrate an inadequate understanding of equilibrium in living systems.
Are unable to distinguish between the major systems of the human body or the different cells associated with each.
Exhibit only a rudimentary knowledge of digestion, absorbtion, and use of foods in organisms, can trace digestion of foods through an organism, with major mistakes.
Provide a description of photosynthesis that is missing major concepts.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
115
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 12 Content Standard 7.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · Internal and External Influences on Organisms: Students understand that organisms respond to internal and external influences.
Cite convincing evidence and give examples of behavior patterns that contribute to survival of a species.
Give multiple examples with clear explanations of responses to an environmental change that enhances the chance of survival of specific plants and animals.
Diagram and explain how the nervous system influences behavior in multicellular animals.
Investigate, using print and electronic resources, and explain, using diagrams and drawings, how certain viral diseases destroy critical cells of the immune system and summarize promising lines of research to combat such diseases.
Accurately give specific examples of how certain viral diseases destroy critical cells of the immune system.
Relate behavior patterns to survival of a species by providing some examples.
Give examples of a response in a plant and an animal to an environmental change that enhances its chance of survival.
Describe the role of the nervous system in receiving input and generating responses in multicellular animals.
Develop a presentation, suitable for middle school students, which explains how the immune system works and how AIDS, a viral disease, destroys critical cells, thereby making the body vulnerable to infectious agents and cancerous cells.
Relate given behavior patterns to survival of a species.
Provide examples which lack clear connections between the organisms response and the chance of survival.
Inadequately describe the role of the nervous system in receiving input and generating responses in multicellular animals.
Make limited connections between viral diseases and their negative impact upon the immune system.
Are unable to relate behavior patterns to survival of species.
Make no connection between an organism's response, to an environmental change, and the chance for survival.
Describe the role of the nervous system in receiving input and generating responses in multicellular animals, but description is erroneous or lacks essential information.
Make no connection between diseases and the immune system.
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · · ·
116
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 12 Content Standard 8.0 Heredity and Diversity: Students understand that life forms are diverse, and that they pass some characteristics to their offspring.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· · · · · · ·
Can discuss the biological, ethical, and ecological implications of DNA biotechnology (e.g., cloning, frozen embryos, genetic engineering).
Defend the practice of using similarities in DNA sequence to classify organisms.
Evaluate genetic combinations for evidence of independent assortment and recombination of genes (e.g., evaluation of pedigrees).
Describe how expressed traits are controlled by DNA.
Independently demonstrate how multiple pairs of genes may control patterns of inheritance.
Propose an environmental change and give examples of how diversity and variation would help a species to survive.
Provide several examples of influences which may cause gene mutations, and cite evidence that mutations occur randomly at low rates.
Explain, in general terms, that all body cells in an organism are developed from a single set of genetic information and that different parts of the instruction are used in different kinds of cells.
Explain, using diagrams and/or charts, how similarity of DNA sequences can be used to estimate the degree of relatedness among organisms.
Relate the great variety of possible gene combinations to sexual reproduction.
Explain how DNA provides instructions for assembling proteins.
Demonstrate how multiple pairs of genes may control patterns of inheritance with minor errors.
Point out, with some examples, how diversity and variation of organisms increase the chance of survival when environmental conditions change.
Describe how a variety of influences may cause gene mutations.
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · · · ·
117
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · · ·
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade: 12 (Standard 8.0 continued) Provide an explanation that all body cells in an organism are developed from a single set of genetic information and that different parts of the instruction are used in different kinds of cells, that is simplistic and lacks important detail.
Provide partial explanation, regarding how similarity of DNA sequences can be used to estimate the degree of relatedness among organisms.
Do not make clear connection between sexual reproduction and gene combinations.
Explain, with some errors and/or omissions, how DNA provides instructions for assembling proteins.
Have difficulty demonstrating how multiple pairs of genes may control pattern of inheritance.
Give limited or weak examples of how diversity and variation of organisms increase the chances of survival when environmental conditions change.
Provide a limited description of how a variety of influences may cause gene mutations.
Provide explanation that all body cells in an organism are developed from a single set of genetic information and that different parts of the instruction are used in different kinds of cells that is missing major parts or contains major errors.
Exhibit major misconceptions in explanation of using DNA sequence data to classify organisms.
Has major misconceptions about genetic variations and gene combinations.
Describes DNA's role in providing instruction for assembling proteins, incompletely and erroneously.
Have major misconceptions of how multiple pairs of genes may control patterns of inheritance.
Have difficulty explaining how diversity and variation of organisms increase the chances of survival when environmental conditions change.
Inadequately describe that a variety of influences may cause gene mutations.
BELOW STANDARD
·
· · · · · ·
118
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade 12 Content Standard 9.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · · · · · Evolution-The Process of Biological Change: Students understand that life forms change over time.
Provide well-developed multiple examples that illustrate the basic concepts underlying the theory of evolution.
Examine the fossil records of ancient life forms, apply the theory of natural selection and illustrate its evolutionary consequences with appropriate examples.
Simulate and explain how the adaptation of a species can occur over many generations because of the unique characteristics that favor those individuals in an environment.
Develop and explain with examples, the multiple lines of evidence that support the theory of evolution, i.e., molecular, embryological and structural.
Provide multiple examples of species that have become extinct and probable reasons for their distinction and explain human interventions to aid endangered species today.
Investigate and explain using examples, how the process of evolution is driven by genetic and environmental influences.
Summarize evidence supporting the development of organisms from single cell to multicellular organisms and explain, using models and/or diagrams, how the process likely occurred.
Explain the basic concepts underlying the theory of evolution.
Investigate and apply the concept of natural selection to explain incremental changes in the fossil record, using an example such as Eohippus.
Relate adaptations of a species and those unique characteristics that favor an organism in a particular environment and use Kettlewell's study of England's peppered moths as an example of natural selection.
Recognize there are various lines of evidence which are used to establish evolutionary relationship among species.
Explain why most species that ever lived are extinct and why many human beings are concerned that endangered species be preserved.
Provide examples of genetic and environmental influences, that drive the process of evolution.
Cite evidence that cells with nuclei existed over 1 billion years ago and that these cells were the precursors to increasingly complex organisms.
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · · · ·
119
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · · · · ·
Science Performance Level Descriptors Life Science Grade: 12 (Standard 9.0 continued) Provide an explanation of basic concepts underlying the theory of evolution that requires further development.
Have difficulty relating natural selection to the fossil record, with some assistance.
Recount the study of the moths of England, but have difficulty explaining its significance.
Display some knowledge of various lines of evidence which are used to establish evolutionary relationship among species.
Have difficulty reconciling the fact that most species that ever lived are extinct, with concern for current day extinctions.
Have difficulty explaining genetic and environmental influences on evolution.
Cite evidence with significant omissions or errors that cells with nuclei existed over 1 billion years ago and these cells were the precursors to increasingly complex organisms.
Are unable to describe the basic concepts underlying the theory of evolution.
Have difficulty explaining how natural selection works and that we see evidence of it in the fossil record.
Make fragmented, incorrect connections between adaptations of a species and characteristics that favor survival in an environment.
Are unable to describe various lines of evidence which are used to establish evolutionary relationship among species.
Do not characterize extinction as a common process.
Do not connect genetic and environmental influences to evolution.
Demonstrate only rudimentary understanding that cells with nuclei existed over 1 billion years ago and these cells were the precursors to increasingly complex organisms.
BELOW STANDARD
· · · · · · ·
120
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 12 Content Standard 10.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD
Earth Structures and Composition: Students understand that the Earth is composed of interrelated systems of rocks, water, air, and life.
· Give a comprehensive explanation of the environment of origin of a sample of a rock, on the basis of obvious structure and mineral composition (e.g., specific environment of deposition for a sedimentary rock, above-versus below-ground formation for an igneous rock); explain why the properties of various earth materials make them valuable for specific uses (e.g., metals conduct heat and electricity, gypsum is lightweight, petroleum can be made into many different products).
Infer the model of continental drift from evidence (e.g., shapes of continents that fit together; mountain ranges, fossils of land-living organisms, and other geologic features that correlate across oceans).
Provide detailed descriptions of how the Earth is layered internally from densest material (nickel-iron) outward to the least dense (silicon-rich rocks), in the same way that liquids of varying densities will become layered with the densest material at the bottom; provide detailed descriptions of how the crust of the Earth is layered in varying ways (e.g., stratigraphy, water tables); and extend this reasoning to the Earth's atmosphere.
Identify the place of origin and describe the probable history of development of soil samples from various locations on the basis of properties and composition of each sample.
Research, using laboratory, print, multimedia, and Internet resources, the effects of historical and present-day changes in the composition of Earth's atmosphere; document qualitative and quantitative changes.
Communicate, using print, maps, models, or multimedia resources, thorough descriptions of the events that formed state and local geologic features.
· ·
· · ·
121
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade: 12 (Standard 10.0 continued) MEETS STANDARD · · · · · Describe the general processes of formation of a given sample of rock (i.e., weathering/eroision/ deposition, melting, heat/pressure); list uses for at least five common earth materials (e.g., gypsum in drywall, metals in electrical devices).
Explain the formation of some topographical features (e.g., volcanoes, rift valleys, ocean trenches, fault-block mountains) in terms of moving lithosphere plates.
Explain how the Earth is generally layered from the most dense material (solids rocks) outward to less dense materials (liquids - oceans, lakes, streams) with the outermost layer being least dense (gases ­ the atmosphere).
Describe the origin of constituents in various samples of soil (e.g., organic materials came from decomposed plants and animals; mineral materials came from weathered rock); compare and contrast composition and properties of different soil horizons.
Describe, citing print, multimedia, or Internet resources, some historical changes in Earth's atmosphere (e.g., the change from a predominantly methane/ammonia atmosphere to today's composition); and describe, citing print, multimedia, or Internet resources, present-day changes in Earth's atmosphere (e.g., increase in carbon dioxide, ozone depletion, air pollution).
Compare and contrast, using maps, models, photographs, and/or field observations, large geologic features throughout the state (e.g., basin and range fault-block mountains, Sierra batholiths); compare and contrast, using maps, models, photographs, and/or field observations, specific local geologic features (e.g., glacial features in Lamoille Canyon, local beach benchmarks from ancient lakes, thrust faults in the Spring Mountains).
Describe some of the structures and compositions found in rocks, but have difficulty relating those descriptions to the formation of those Earth materials.
Demonstrate partial understanding that landforms may result from movements in the Earth's crust (i.e., earthquakes, volcanic eruptions), but explanations fail to communicate the large-scale regional or global model of lithosphere plate movement.
Give somewhat inconsistent and inaccurate descriptions of the layering in, on, and above the Earth's surface.
Give some incomplete or inaccurate descriptions of soil samples; comparisons of different soil horizons lack necessary details.
Give some unrealistic or misleading descriptions of past and present changes in Earth's atmosphere.
Give descriptions of local and state geological features that lack necessary detail.
·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· ·
· · · ·
122
BELOW STANDARD
· · · · · ·
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade: 12 (Standard 10.0 continued) Demonstrate limited understanding and provide inaccurate descriptions of the properties, origins, and uses of Earth materials.
Are unable to explain the formation of topographical features in terms of movements in the Earth's crust.
Give meager, and often inaccurate, descriptions of the layering in, on, and above the Earth's surface.
Provide mostly inaccurate and incomplete descriptions of soil samples, and have little success in making comparisons of different soil horizons.
Give mostly inaccurate descriptions of past and present changes in Earth's atmosphere.
Give insufficient descriptions of local and state geological features.
123
Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade: 12 Content Standard 11.0
Earth Models: Students understand that the Earth may be represented by a variety of maps and models.
· · · · Draw a topographic profile on paper or model a 3-dimensional surface on a computer based on data from a contour map.
Define a location in the sky in terms of azimuth and altitude.
Construct a contour map of a simple model landform; build a model landform from a simple contour map.
Define a location on the Earth in terms of latitude and longitude to the precision of degrees, minutes, and seconds; determine the time in any time zone given the time of day in any other time zone.
Construct a contour of a simple model landform, with some errors; build a model landform, with some inaccuracies, from a simple contour map.
Define, with slight imprecision, a location on the Earth in terms of latitude and longitude to the precision of degrees, minutes, and seconds; attempt to determine the time in any time zone given the time of day in any other time zone.
Construct a contour map of a simple model landform, with major errors; build, with major inaccuracies, a model landform from a simple contour map.
Are unable to define a location on the Earth in terms of latitude and longitude or to determine the time in any time zone given the time of day in any other time zone.
EXCEEDS STANDARD MEETS STANDARD
APPROACHES STANDARD
· ·
BELOW STANDARD
· ·
124
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 12 Content Standard 12.0
Earth History: Students understand that Earth systems (such as weather and mountain formation) may change or vary.
· · · Extensively analyze, using Internet, print, and audio-visual materials, the causes and effects of five both recent and ancient examples of catastrophic geologic events.
Examine actual or graphical representations of rock sequences to infer geologic history (e.g., cross-cutting, fossil, structural, erosional, and superpositional relationships).
Determine the age of a geologic or cultural artifact using actual or simulated half-life or dendrochronology data.
Analyze the causes, using Internet, print, or audio-visual materials, and describe two both recent and ancient examples of catastrophic geologic events.
Create a representation of a stratigraphic column based on actual or photographic data which represents rock sequences and unconformities (erosion surfaces).
Compare and contrast the variety of methods by which geologic time is determined (e.g., radioactive dating, dendrochronology, stratigraphy, and faunal succession) Investigate, using Internet, print, or audio-visual materials, and incompletely describe two both recent and ancient examples of catastrophic geologic events.
Create a partially complete representation of a stratigraphic column based on actual or photographic data which represents rock sequences and unconformities.
Compare and contrast the variety of methods by which geologic time is determined, but aspects of the analysis are incomplete or erroneous.
Investigate, using Internet, print, or audio-visual materials, and insufficiently describe both recent and ancient examples of catastrophic geologic events.
Create a representation of a stratigraphic column, which is inaccurate and missing major parts.
Are unable to identify and adequately describe the essential features of major methods used to determine geologic time.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · ·
125
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade 12 Content Standard 13.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Cycles of Matter and Energy: Students understand that Earth systems have a variety of cycles through which energy and matter continuously flow.
· · · · · · · · Compare and contrast Earth's three major sources of energy and how they influence cycles of matter and energy in and on the surface of the Earth.
Describe extensively the relationships between ocean currents and global climate.
Analyze, using technology, the abiotic characteristics (pH, total dissolved solids, dissolved oxygen) of a river or stream and correlate those observations to geologic or cultural features found upstream.
Explain in detail how paleoclimatologists infer past climatic changes from evidence gathered from fossils, rocks, and glacial ice.
Make reasonable predictions as to how a disruption of a portion of Earth's system of cycles (rock, carbon, nitrogen) would affect the physical and biological components of those cycles and explain their rationale.
Explain extensively, using diagrams or animated multimedia presentations, the global system of the cycles of rocks, carbon and nitrogen, including details of living and nonliving components of these cycles as appropriate.
Analyze in detail current proposals of global warming and how predicted changes may affect social, economic, and environmental conditions regionally and globally.
Calculate, using experimental data, the rate of movement of a lithosphere plate, and extrapolate relative plate positions for a million or more years into the future.
126
MEETS STANDARD
· ·
·
·
·
· ·
·
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade: 12 (Standard 13.0 continued) Explain that Earth systems have two major internal sources of energy (decay of radioactive isotopes and gravitational energy) and one major external source (the sun), all of which create heat and link these respectively to their major effect.
Observe and describe convection currents formed by heating water in a container; explain, using diagrams and citing first-hand observations, how uneven heating of the Earth's surface from the sun forms convection currents within the atmosphere and ocean, producing wind and ocean currents that are modified by the Earth's rotation.
Investigate water's unusual ability to dissolve a wide range of substances and explain, using diagrams and citing first-hand observations, how water dissolves minerals and gases as it passes through the water cycle and carries them to oceans and lakes.
Describe, using diagrams or multimedia presentations, how global climate is determined primarily by the conversion of light and ultraviolet energy to infrared radiation at and near the Earth's surface; describe how relatively small changes in solar output may have contributed to large changes in the Earth's climate in the past (e.g., ice ages, interglacial periods).
Explain how large-scale, long-term equilibrium can accommodate small-scale changes, citing specific examples such as: · a relatively small disruption (e.g., fire, landslide, flood) of a large ecosystem may disturb patterns, (e.g., food webs, cycles of matter) found in that ecosystem, but over time new patterns may form or old patterns may re-establish; · a regional disruption of climate (e.g., El Niño) may cause global changes in weather, but it may not have a significant impact on climate over long periods of time (i.e., hundreds or thousands of years).
Explain, using diagrams or animated multimedia presentations, the global system of the cycles of rocks, carbon, and nitrogen, including living and nonliving components of these cycles as appropriate.
Describe the model of the greenhouse effect, including listing the various gases, which impede the transfer of long-wave radiation ("heat") from Earth into space; explain that the idea of global warming is based on observations subject to multiple interpretations and predictions, and is less certain than the model of the greenhouse effect, which is one component of the idea of global warming, but which is based on reproducible laboratory data.
Model, using multimedia software or other methods, and explain how the energy that propels the Earth's lithosphere plates is dominantly a result of nuclear processes deep in the Earth.
127
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade: 12 (Standard 13.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · Describe with minimal detail that Earth systems have two major internal sources of energy and one major external source, all of which create heat.
Observe and describe convection currents formed by heating water in a container, but have difficulty using the observed behaviors to explain how uneven heating of the Earth's surface from the sun forms convection currents within the atmosphere and ocean, and how these wind and ocean currents are further modified by the Earth's rotation.
Investigate water's ability to dissolve a wide range of substances, but give unclear or unsupported explanations of how water dissolves minerals and gases as it passes through the water cycle and carries them to oceans and lakes.
Provide an incomplete or confusing description of how global climate is determined primarily by the conversion of light and ultraviolet energy to infrared radiation at and near the Earth's surface; describe incompletely how relatively small changes in solar output may have contributed to large changes in the Earth's climate in the past.
Explain in vague terms or with inadequate illustrations, how large-scale, long-term equilibrium can accommodate small-scale changes.
Attempt to explain, using diagrams or animated multimedia presentations, the global system of the cycles of rocks, carbon and nitrogen, including living and nonliving components of these cycles as appropriate, but explanations lack essential detail and/or are confusing.
Describe the greenhouse effect incompletely and/or with some errors.
Have difficulty explaining the idea of global warming is based on observations subject to multiple interpretations relating it to the greenhouse effect, for which there is sounder evidence of the idea of global warming, but which is based on repeatable laboratory data.
Model inadequately or give an incomplete or faulty explanation of how the energy that propels the Earth's lithosphere plates is dominantly a result of nuclear processes deep in the Earth.
Describe with insufficient detail and clarity that Earth systems have two major internal sources of energy and one major external source, all of which create heat.
Provide inadequate descriptions of convection currents formed by heating water in a container and are unable to explain coherently how uneven heating of the Earth's surface from the sun forms convection currents within the atmosphere and ocean, producing wind and ocean currents that are modified by the Earth's rotation.
Have difficulty describing the action of water as a solvent and relating it to the dissolution of minerals and gases in the water cycle.
Describe with major errors how global climate is determined and are unable to explain how relatively small changes in solar output may have contributed to large changes in the Earth's climate in the past.
Are unable to give coherent explanations of how large-scale, long-term equilibrium can accommodate small-scale changes.
Are unable to explain and relate the cycles of rocks, carbon, and nitrogen, to a global system.
Are unable to define the greenhouse effect and relate it to the idea of global warming.
Are unable to model and explain coherently how the energy that propels the Earth's lithosphere plates is dominantly a result of nuclear processes deep in the Earth.
· ·
· ·
· ·
·
BELOW STANDARD
· ·
· · · · · ·
128
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Science Grade 12 Content Standard 14.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Earth and Space Sciences: Students understand that the Earth is part of a planetary system within the Milky Way galaxy, which is part of the known universe.
· · · · · · · Relate surface features on other planets to the processes which formed them; relate their respective masses to their physical properties.
Make simple quantitative predictions about the motion of planets using Kepler's laws of planetary motion.
Explain how stars produce energy and elements heavier than hydrogen from nuclear reactions, illustrate with appropriate balanced equations.
Describe the theoretical formation of the solar system.
Describe the opposing effects of gravity and nuclear processes in the evolution of stars.
Describe objects found outside the solar system (e.g., stars, quasars, pulsars, galaxies).
Apply physical laws qualitatively or quantitatively to real or hypothetical situations (e.g., explain how laws of Newton, Kepler, and relativity would impact travelers on a high-speed spaceship).
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and compare and contrast the Earth's atmosphere, water, temperature, and composition with those conditions on other planets.
Explain, using print or multimedia software, how most objects in the solar system are in regular and predictable motion, and relate that motion to such phenomena as the day, the year, phases of the moon, and eclipses.
Explain that stars produce energy and elements heavier than hydrogen from nuclear reactions.
Estimate the age of the universe as ten billion years and cite supporting scientific evidence.
Describe how increasingly sophisticated technology (e.g., mathematical models and computer simulations) is used to learn about the universe.
Explain that the physical laws (e.g., the laws of Newton, Kepler, thermodynamics, relativity, and quantum physics) appear to apply to all bodies in the universe.
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · · ·
129
Science Performance Level Descriptors Earth and Space Sciences Grade: 12 (Standard 14.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and compare and contrast the Earth's atmosphere, water, temperature, and composition with those conditions on other planets, but descriptions are somewhat incomplete or erroneous.
Attempt to explain, using print or multimedia software, how most objects in the solar system are in regular and predictable motion, and relate motion to such phenomena as the day, the year, phases of the moon, and eclipses, but explanations are confusing.
Attempt to explain that stars produce energy and elements heavier than hydrogen from nuclear reactions, but explanation is vague.
Estimate the age of the universe as ten billion years, but do not cite supporting scientific evidence.
Describe, within a narrow range, how increasingly sophisticated technology is used to learn about the universe.
Are unable to explain clearly the meaning of important physical laws and their applications to all bodies in the universe.
Investigate atmosphere, water content, temperature, and composition of the planets, but make poor use of resources and produce comparisons that are incomplete and erroneous.
Are unable to describe how most objects in the solar system are in regular and predictable motion, and relate that motion to such phenomena as the day, the year, phases of the moon, and eclipses.
Cannot describe the source of stars' energy.
Do not describe the estimated age of the universe to be about ten billion years.
Describe vaguely how increasingly sophisticated technology is used to learn about the universe.
Are unable to explain satisfactorily the meaning of physical laws.
130
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 12 Content Standard 15.0 Ecosystems: Students will demonstrate an understanding that ecosystems display patterns of organization, change, and stability as a result of the interactions and interdependencies among the life forms and the physical components of the Earth.
· · · Analyze and describe how multiple changes in an ecosystem may affect biodiversity and contribute to an ecosystem's stability or instability.
Use a model or diagram to demonstrate how an ecosystem may change or remain the same in response to different kinds of influences.
Trace, using charts, graphs, or diagrams, the movement of particular elements through food webs and relate this movement to the carbon, nitrogen, and water bio-geochemical cycles; explain how matter is passed along in food chains that intertwine to form webs and how it can be recycled among components of the ecosystem.
Compare and contrast the geologic, hydrologic, climatic, and biological characteristics of Nevada's bioregions, giving extensive examples.
Investigate and describe how changes in an ecosystem may affect biodiversity and contribute to an ecosystem's stability or instability, using specific examples.
Explain how an ecosystem may change or remain the same in response to different kinds of influences; contrast the immediate and long-term effects of a disaster (e.g., flood, fire) with those produced by a change in climate or introduction of a new species.
Interpret a food web showing how materials and energy are cycled through ecosystems.
Compare and contrast the geologic, hydrologic, climatic, and biological characteristics of Nevada's principal bioregions (e.g., Northern Nevada's cold desert, Southern Nevada's warm desert).
Explain, in very general terms, how changes in an ecosystem may affect biodiversity and contribute to an ecosystem's stability or instability.
Describe, in a rudimentary way, how an ecosystem may change or remain the same in response to different kinds of influences.
Require assistance in interpreting a food web showing how materials and energy are cycled through ecosystems.
Describe gross differences in the geologic, hydrologic, climatic, and biological characteristics of Nevada's bioregions.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· MEETS STANDARD · ·
· ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · ·
131
BELOW STANDARD
· · · ·
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade: 12 (Standard 15.0 continued) Are unable to explain the relationship between biodiversity and an ecosystem's stability or instability.
Are unable to explain that an ecosystem might change or remain the same in response to different kinds of influences.
Are unable to relate food webs to how materials and energy are cycled through the environment.
Display limited understanding of differences in the geological, hydrologic, climatic, and biological characteristics of Nevada's bioregions.
132
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 12 Content Standard 16.0
Natural Resources: Students demonstrate and understand that natural resources include renewable and non-renewable materials and energy.
All organisms, including human, use resources to maintain and improve their existence, and the use of resources can have positive and negative consequences.
· Research, using print, multimedia, and/or Internet resources, and evaluate the positive and negative consequences of changing the way the nation uses a natural resource, including implications for individuals; develop an action plan identifying key steps to be taken to change the current pattern.
Evaluate the costs and benefits of the various processes involved in obtaining, using, and recycling a specific class of materials such as wood products, minerals, or plastics.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and use graphs, charts, and/or diagrams to describe trends in career opportunities associated with the study, exploration, extraction, utilization, protection, and restoration of natural resources.
Investigate, using simulations or models, the limitations of an Earth system's ability to respond to stresses produced by human or natural activities.
Predict the logical effects (e.g., on ecosystems, infrastructure, economies) that changes in human populations (e.g., population increase or decrease, patterns of migration) will cause in a local area or large region.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, and/or the Internet, the positive and negative consequences of changing the way in which the nation as a whole and individuals use a natural resource (e.g., moving from fossil fuels to solar power might reduce air pollution, but would likely involve the extraction and use of Earth materials to make solar apparatus; recycling aluminum cans reduces the energy involved in extracting aluminum ore, but requires changing personal habits and creating new systems for recycling).
Investigate and describe the various processes involved in obtaining, using, and recycling a specific class of materials such as wood products, minerals, or plastics; cite environmental implications.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe the career opportunities associated with the study, exploration, extraction, utilization, protection, and restoration of natural resources.
Analyze and describe the limitations of Earth's ability to respond to several different kinds of stresses produced by human or natural activities.
For example: · excessive rates of groundwater removal can destroy an aquifer's ability to recharge · channelization of mature rivers can change capacity for bioremediation by reducing the amount of wetland or marsh area the water normally passes through · forest fire in marginally arable areas can, over the short or long term, reduce soil stability and increase erosion.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· · · ·
MEETS STANDARD
·
· · ·
·
Analyze and evaluate the effects that changes in human populations have caused (e.g., resource depletion and environmental degradation with population increase; changes in ecosystems, both positive and negative, when human populations migrate), citing specific cases.
133
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade: 12 (Standard 16.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · Investigate in a cursory manner and/or conduct a superficial analysis of the positive and negative consequences of changing the way in which a natural resource is used.
Investigate and describe various processes involved in obtaining, using, and recycling a specific class of materials such as wood products, minerals, or plastic, but investigation, description, and application to the environment are weak.
Investigate, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe with insufficient detail opportunities associated with the study, exploration, extraction, utilization, protection, and restoration of natural resources.
Analyze and describe, with some errors, the limitations of Earth's ability to respond to stresses produced by human or natural activities.
Analyze and evaluate, with inconsistencies or errors, the effects that changes in human populations have caused.
Do not locate essential information, and produce an analysis that fails to identify the positive and negative consequences of changing the way in which a natural resource is used.
Insufficiently investigate and describe with little success various processes involved in obtaining, using, and recycling a specific class of materials such as wood products, minerals, food, and manufactured objects.
Investigate with minimal understanding, using print, multimedia, or Internet resources, and describe, with little success, the career opportunities associated with the study, exploration, extraction, utilization, protection, and restoration of natural resources.
Analyze and describe incompletely or erroneously the limitations of Earth's ability to respond to several different kinds of stresses produced by human or natural activities.
Analyze incompletely and provide a meager evaluation of the effects that changes in human populations can cause.
BELOW STANDARD
· · · · ·
134
Science Performance Level Descriptors Environmental Sciences Grade 12 Content Standard 17.0 Conservation: Students understand that humans have the unique ability to change personal and societal behavior based on ethical considerations regarding other organisms, the planet as a whole, and future generations.
· Compare two or more countries, one representative of an emerging country and one a fully industrialized country, on the basis of their energy consumption patterns, conservation efforts, and cultural practices, and summarize the resulting environmental impacts, using graphs, diagrams, and/or charts.
Compare and contrast a human impact with a natural impact (e.g., volcano eruption, asteroid collision) on the equilibrium of global systems.
Demonstrate that there is scientific uncertainty regarding many environmental issues, using appropriate examples and citing relevant research.
Discuss global actions that may affect Nevada's environment or economy and the impact of related trade-offs.
Analyze the energy condition, conservation efforts, and societal behavior patterns of the U.S. Discuss how human actions may impact the equilibrium of global systems.
Select a representative example and show how there can be scientific uncertainty regarding an environmental issue, due to its complexity or the length of time required to ascertain effects.
Provide examples of global actions that may affect Nevada's environment or economy and the impact of related trade-offs.
Describe in general terms consumption patterns, conservation efforts, and cultural practices in terms of their environmental impacts.
Demonstrate some knowledge of how human actions may impact the equilibrium of global systems.
State that there is scientific uncertainty regarding many environmental issues but does not substantiate statement with convincing examples.
Are able to make only tenuous connections between global actions and Nevada's environment or economy.
Describe in general, superficial terms consumption patterns, conservation efforts, and cultural practices and their respective environmental impact.
Discuss in rudimentary terms how human actions may impact the equilibrium of global systems.
Fail to analyze environmental issues sufficiently to detect the scientific uncertainty that exists.
Are unable to describe global actions that may affect Nevada's environment or economy.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · ·
135
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 12 Content Standard 18.0 Scientific, Historical, and Technological Perspectives: Students understand that humans have the unique ability to change personal and societal behavior based on ethical considerations regarding other organisms, the planet as a whole and future generations.
(Nature of Science, Attributes of Scientific Research, The History of Science and Invention, Technology, The Dynamic Character of Scientific Knowledge, Scientific Ethics) · Model that the scientific way of knowing uses a critique and consensus process by communicating methods and procedures used in scientific investigations to a panel of teachers or to the public.
· Investigate, using multiple sources, and concisely explain how public policy impacts the allocation of research monies.
· Extensively investigate and explain, by recreating the proof, how scientific concepts that were originally challenged are now widely accepted.
· Explain, with appropriate examples, that scientists work with others to resolve differences in interpretation of observation.
· Provide examples of how technological problems create a demand for new scientific knowledge and how new technologies make it possible for scientists to extend their research in new ways or to undertake entirely new lines of research and postulate the effect of a new technology on science.
· Provide compelling examples of scientific knowledge that built on previous information and show how multiple theories evolved over time as new evidence developed.
· Investigate and summarize, using multiple sources, actual case studies in which scientists were charged with violating ethical procedures.
· · · · · Demonstrate to their peers that the scientific way of knowing uses a critique and consensus process (e.g., communicate methods and procedures used in scientific investigations to peers and teachers).
Investigate and explain that public policy impacts the allocation of research monies (e.g., nuclear research, cancer, AIDS research).
Research and explain how a scientific innovation that was originally challenged is now widely accepted (e.g., sun-centered model of the solar system).
Explain, with an appropriate example, that scientists work with others to resolve differences in interpretation of observations.
Provide examples of technological problems that create a demand for new scientific knowledge and new technologies which make it possible for scientists to extend their research in new ways or to undertake entirely new lines.
Provide examples of scientific knowledge that built on previous information and communicate that entire theories are rarely completely discarded in favor of new ones (e.g., the Greek view of the atom vs. the quantum mechanical view.
Provide examples of ethical scientific policies and the reasons for those policies.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
MEETS STANDARD
·
·
136
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade: 12 (Standard 18.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · Using examples to describe that the scientific way of knowing uses a critique and consensus process.
Explain how public policy impacts the allocation of research monies with some misconceptions.
Research, but explain incompletely, how a scientific concept that was originally challenged is now widely accepted.
State that scientists work with others to resolve differences in interpretation of observations.
State that technological problems create a demand for new scientific knowledge and new technologies make it possible for scientists to extend their research in new ways or to undertake entirely new lines of research, but cannot provide good examples.
Cite examples of scientific knowledge that built on previous information explaining that entire theories are rarely completely discarded in favor of new ones.
State that scientists have ethical procedures, violations of which have consequences, but are unable to describe specific examples.
Describe that the scientific way of knowing uses a critique and consensus process.
Cannot explain how public policy impacts the allocation of research monies.
Research, but cannot adequately describe how a scientific concept that was originally challenged is now widely accepted.
Cannot explain why scientists work with others to resolve differences in interpretation of observations.
Cannot explain how technological problems create a demand for new scientific knowledge and new technologies make it possible for scientists to extend their research in new ways or to undertake entirely new lines of research.
Are unable to provide examples of scientific knowledge that built on previous information.
Are not aware that scientists are expected to follow ethical procedures.
· · BELOW STANDARD · · · · ·
· ·
137
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 12 Content Standard 19.0 Reasoning and Critical Response Skills: Independently evaluate how the validity of the techniques used affect the credibility of the information obtained in a specific kind of scientific investigation, i.e., controlled experiment, field work or secondary research.
· · · Independently evaluate how the validity of the techniques used affect the credibility of the information obtained in a specific kind of scientific investigation.
Develop and present a comprehensive, insightful analysis of costs, benefits and risks, including probable long and short-term effects, in a decision-making situation.
Analyze three systems (one each from life, physical and earth/space science) which are qualitatively different from the components that comprise them and explain, using appropriate graphics, how the individual components interact with the system as a whole.
Distinguish among scientific laws, theories, rules and hypotheses by explaining in detail how these concepts apply to three different contexts: life, physical and earth/space science.
Describe the limits of generalizations, assumptions, analogies and models in general terms and apply the limits to specific instances in two different contexts.
Evaluate how the validity of the techniques (e.g., sampling procedures) used affect the credibility of the information obtained in a specific kind of scientific investigation such as controlled experiment, field work or secondary research.
Develop and present an analysis of costs, benefits and risks that includes all major factors in a decision-making situation (e.g., creating a man-made lake to enhance a new subdivision).
Identify and accurately describe examples of systems which are quantitatively different from the components which comprise them (e.g., how populations differ from individuals, how a cardiac system differs from its individual cells; how the features of a carburetor are unique to it yet it functions in an engine system; a raindrop's role in the water cycle).
Compare and contrast a scientific law, theory, rule and hypothesis.
Explain the limits of generalizations, assumptions, analogies and models by relating and applying each term to a specific concept in science.
Identify common techniques used to gather information in different kinds of investigations, but are unable to discern how the application of these techniques can affect the quality of the information gathered.
Develop a simplified analysis of costs, benefits, and risks in a decision-making situation.
Attempt to describe situations in which a system is qualitatively different from the parts which comprise it, but the description is incomplete or inaccurate.
Have difficulty in identifying the essential features of generalizations, assumptions, analogies and models and therefore cannot explain their limits.
EXCEEDS STANDARD
· · MEETS STANDARD · · ·
·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · · ·
138
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade: 12 (Standard 19.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · Are unable to describe differences in common techniques to gather information.
Are unable to develop an analysis of costs, benefits, and risks in a decision making process.
Have difficulty in understanding that a given system may be qualitatively different from the parts that comprise it.
Cannot explain that hypothesis are based on past experiences, logical thinking and reasonable assumptions.
Are unable to identify the essential features of generalizations, assumptions, analogies and models.
139
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 12 Content Standard 20.0 EXCEEDS STANDARDS Systems, models, risk and predictions: Students understand that a variety of models can be used to describe or predict things and events.
· · · · · Match appropriate mathematical symbols and formulas to the corresponding situations confidently and accurately.
Use a computer model to simulate the effects of applying complex rules or of changing the rules; evaluate the usefulness of the model by comparing the results to actual observations of nature.
Identify and describe how systems are often different from their components using multiple examples.
Accurately compare groups of data, taking into account percentages and actual numbers and explain why both are necessary and apply these comparisons to any appropriate situation.
Analyze different types of hazards and using specific examples: · concisely estimate the impacts of hazards · estimate consequences of exposure to a hazard · give fully developed recommendations of ways of reducing or eliminating
hazards.
MEETS STANDARD
· · · · ·
Use mathematical symbols and formulas to express (e.g., universal gas law, Newton's Laws of Motion).
Use models to identify and predict cause and effect relationships (e.g., effect of temperature on gas volume, effect of carbon dioxide level on the greenhouse effect).
Can identify and describe how systems are often different from their components using an example (e.g. aquaria or automobiles).
Compare groups of data, taking into account both percentages and actual numbers.
Identify types of hazards (e.g. chemical transportation on highways or railways, earthquakes, drought).
Choose one example and: · estimate impacts (fire, explosion) · estimate consequences of exposure to a hazard (illness, death, economic loss of property, loss of livelihood.
· provide examples of ways of reducing or eliminating risks (laws, planning and zoning, safety precautions.
140
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade: 12 (Standard 20.0 continued) APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · Given mathematical symbols and formulas use to express a relationship calculate an answer.
Experience limited success in using models to identify and predict cause and effect relationships.
Identify inconsistently and describe how systems are often different from their components.
Have difficulty comparing groups of data, taking into account both percentages and actual numbers.
Are sometimes able to identify types of hazards (e.g. chemical transportation on highways or railways, earthquakes, drought).
Inconsistently estimate impacts and consequences of hazards by: · attempting to estimate consequences of exposure to a hazard · providing unclear examples of ways of reducing or eliminating hazards.
Use mathematical symbols and formulas to express relationships that behave in the same way as the objects or processes under investigation with inconsistent results (e.g., identify key mathematical relationships derived from models, but have little or no success in applying them).
Fail to grasp the underlying concept of using models to predict actual changes in the real world.
Cannot identify or describe how systems are often different from their components (e.g., aquaria or automobiles).
Are unable to compare groups of data, taking into account both percentages and actual numbers.
Can identify types of hazards and have little success in estimating impacts of consequences but: · partially estimate impacts of hazards · have little success in estimating consequences of exposure to hazards · provide few examples of ways of reducing of eliminating hazards.
BELOW STANDARD
·
· · · ·
141
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 12 Content Standard 21.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · BELOW STANDARD · · · Scientific Values and Attitudes: Students understand that science is an active process of systematically examining the natural world.
Demonstrate, through written and oral work, curiosity, honesty, and the ability to withhold judgment, consistently.
Repeat experimentation for statistical analysis to produce conclusions that are well-supported and without bias.
Propose and evaluate the worth of competing explanations for the same evidence.
Clearly demonstrate, through written or oral work, curiosity, honesty, and skepticism (e.g., asking questions, not changing data, reasonably accounting for discrepant data, critically evaluating false or controversial findings).
Repeat experimentation for statistical analysis to produce conclusions that are well-supported.
Given a common phenomenon, generate multiple explanations and describe which explanation is the most logical.
Demonstrate, on occasion, curiosity, honesty, and skepticism in written or oral work.
Inconsistently repeat experimentation for statistical analysis to produce wellsupported conclusions.
Offer a single explanation for the same evidence.
Demonstrate sporadically, curiosity, honesty, and/or skepticism in their written or oral work.
Omit repetition of experimentation.
Are unable to generate an explanation for evidence.
142
Science Performance Level Descriptors Communication Skills Grade 12 Content Standard 22.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · Communication Skills: Students understand that a variety of communication methods can be used to share scientific information.
Analyze experimental procedures skillfully and suggest appropriate revisions to improve the effectiveness or efficiency of the procedures.
Use tables, charts, and graphs to great advantage in making arguments and claims in oral and written presentations.
Discuss scientific topics in a thorough, insightful manner by restating or summarizing accurately what others have said, asking for clarification or elaboration, expressing alternative positions succinctly, and making use of print, Internet, and multi -media resources.
Analyze experimental procedures and suggest appropriate revisions for improvement.
Incorporate the use of tables, charts, and graphs to effectively make arguments and claims in oral and written presentations.
Discuss scientific topics by restating or summarizing accurately what others have said, asking for clarification or elaboration, expressing alternative positions, and making use of available print, Internet, and multi- media resources.
Occasionally misinterpret experimental procedures and/or suggest inappropriate revisions for improvement.
Use tables, charts, and graphs in making arguments and claims in oral and written presentations but in ways that do not add to the effectiveness of the presentations.
Have limited success in discussing scientific topics due to difficulty in restating or summarizing what others have said, expressing alternative positions and/or making use of available print, Internet, and multi -media resources.
Have little success in analyzing experimental procedures and in suggesting appropriate revisions for improvement.
Use tables, charts, and graphs incoherently in making arguments and claims in oral and written presentations.
Discuss scientific topics in such a way that misinformation and/or confusion usually result.
MEETS STANDARD
· · ·
APPROACHES STANDARD
· · ·
BELOW STANDARD
· · ·
143
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 12 Content Standard 23.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD Scientific Applications of Mathematics: Students understand that scientific inquiry is enhanced and often communicated by using mathematics.
· · · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · Determine what the relationships are between variables in an investigation and express these relationships as equations.
Select and use an algebraic relationship appropriate to a problem and arrive at an accurate solution.
Give accurate answers to assigned problems with the correct order of magnitude.
Explain the differences among and be able to use derived quantities, ratios, proportions, and constants to solve appropriate problems.
Provide a thorough explanation or analysis of why a calculation does not agree with the expected result and correct the procedure to obtain an accurate result.
Can select samples by several different random systems to avoid bias.
Determine the relationship between variables in an investigation (e.g., direct, inverse, square).
Use a "pre-selected" algebraic relationship to calculate the answer to a problem (e.g., given density = mass/volume, calculate one of the three variables given the values of the other two).
Be able to identify what the correct order of magnitude would be for an answer to a specific problem.
Can use derived quantities, ratios, proportions, and constants to solve appropriate problems.
Provide an explanation or analysis of why a calculation does not agree with the expected result (e.g., the calculation of percent accuracy and class precision).
Can select samples by a random system to avoid bias.
Misinterpret the relationship between variables in an investigation.
Attempt to use algebraic equations when appropriate.
Inconsistently able to identify the correct order of magnitude for an answer to a specific problem.
Can generally use ratios, proportions, and constants.
Need prompting in providing a reasonable explanation or analysis of why a calculation does not agree with the expected result.
Given a random system, can select an unbiased sample.
144
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade: 12 (Standard 23.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Have little success in determining the relationship between variables in an investigation.
Use few algebraic equations; often use inappropriate application.
Cannot identify the correct order of magnitude for an answer to a problem.
Use ratios, proportions, and constants, with little success.
Cannot provide an explanation or analysis of why a calculation does not agree with the expected result.
Cannot select an unbiased sample using any system.
145
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade 12 Content Standard 24.0 EXCEEDS STANDARD · · · · · · MEETS STANDARD · · · · · · APPROACHES STANDARD · · · · · · Laboratory Skills and Safety: Students can appropriately and safely apply the tools and techniques of scientific inquiry.
Consistently demonstrate personal responsibility for using safety equipment, observe all safety standards, and assist others to do so.
Follow the information found in materials safety data sheets on proper handling, storage, and disposal of chemicals.
Inspect, manipulate, and teach others the functions of various parts of technical and scientific equipment.
Maintain a comprehensive, permanent record of procedures, data analyses, decisions, error analyses, and conclusions drawn from scientific investigations and recommendations for further study.
Write clear and concise procedures for the investigation of delegated or original scientific problems that are readily comprehended by others.
Independently design, carry out, and write a report on a scientific investigation.
Consistently demonstrate personal responsibility for using safety equipment and observing all safety standards.
Consistently follow the instructions given by the teacher on the proper handling, storage, and disposal of chemicals.
Inspect, manipulate, and describe the functions of various parts of technical and scientific equipment.
Maintain a satisfactory record of procedures, data analyses, decisions, and conclusions drawn from scientific investigations.
Write procedures for the investigation of delegated or original scientific problems that are comprehensible.
Design, carry out, and report on a scientific investigation.
Inconsistently demonstrate personal responsibility for using safety equipment and observing all safety standards.
Require constant reminders to adhere to established standards given by the teacher on the proper handling, storage, and disposal of chemicals.
Inspect, manipulate, and describe, with some errors, the functions of various parts of technical and scientific equipment.
Maintain a somewhat sketchy record of procedures, data analyses, decisions, and conclusions drawn from scientific investigations.
Write procedures for the investigation of delegated or original scientific problems that lack adequate precision and/or detail.
Design, carry out, and report on a scientific investigation with considerable teacher assistance.
146
Science Performance Level Descriptors Processes and Skills Grade: 12 (Standard 24.0 continued) BELOW STANDARD · · · · · · Do not demonstrate personal responsibility for using safety equipment and observing all safety standards.
Require constant supervision in order to prevent injury to self or others while handling , storing and disposing of chemicals properly.
Inspect, manipulate, and describe, with substantive errors or misconceptions, the functions of various parts of technical and scientific equipment.
Do not maintain a permanent record of procedures, data analyses, decisions, and conclusions drawn from scientific investigations.
Write procedures for the investigations of delegated or original scientific problems that are incomprehensible.
Fail to design, carry out, and report on a scientific investigation.
147
